refusing to buy another bottle of warm water I suffered with what I had....
See, I like these beliefs. I believe them. Every once in a while something will rear up: a disappointment, a seeming roadblock, a bill staring me in the face, a conflict I can’t seem to resolve… and then I examine it to see what’s going on with me.
He hugged her and escorted her to class. Jude wasn’t much of a fan of public displays of affection, but April would never deny something like that.
However, a lot of white people here in Britain are imitating this crap. I see them every day in Bristol.
When I saw the challenge from Crafty Cardmakers, I knew I had to enter. Why? Because the main colour to use was YELLOW and I still have loads of yellow stuff left over from the Docrafts January goody bag.
The models of organization in this sport were the old Cold War East Germany and Soviet Union. They took sport seriously – some might even say a bit too seriously. Yes, they had their faults – primarily their state operated doping programs, so let’s get this out of the way off the top. I’m in NO way suggesting that we emulate THAT part of their program – because I’m sure someone will say that I am. What I am saying is that doping aside, they were the model for identifying talent (athletic and coaching) and seeing that talent was matched with coaching, and that potential was maximized.
I use a timer because I'm super forgetful, and I'm used to having one in the lab so I don't need to think about times.
The train in the tunnel, this country girl, this newspaper laden with trivia – if they were not the symbols of this unfathomable, ignoble, and tedious life of ours, what were they?
Whether this study is legitimate or not, i can tell you that if there is not an Anti-Government Phobia by medical definition, there is definitely government precautions to prevent an uprising, now more than ever, and growing, for whatever reason you believe. Some of the things to look for, according to the FBI, include purchasing large amounts of storable foods, medical supplies, flashlights, munitions, guns, ect. Other things to look for also include paying with cash, not paying taxes, yawning (true), smelling bad, missing fingers, and a long long list of many other things that have demonized average citizens and turned this country into a police-state, manipulated by Zionist news stations and entertainment, owned by foreign bankers, and run by the United Nations.
I knew I would never be able to age the beer in oak barrels to get that bourbon finish, so I ordered three pints and drank them very slowly!
Alexander, in full papal regalia, blesses the army before withdrawing to Francesco’s castle for safety. He’s greeted by Bianca (dressed in red!) and the two make polite small talk before she takes him upstairs for dinner, trailed by Cesare and Cardinal Sforza.
I cut the image with a scalloped rectangle nestie and then added it onto the card with pop dots. The sentiment is cut out with my silhouette. Isn't this the most fantastic paper? I bought this new paper pad by My Minds Eye -- happened to jump into my hands as I was leaving my local papercraft store, Urban Papers.
3 tbsp preserves or jam of your choice
All three played a pivotal part in yesterday’s victory which was, as a result, ironic as much as it was sweet. It was a tense game, the fact that two of the goals were down to mistakes said it all. The plot reminded me of the 1986 final with Everton dominating at the start but not making it count, allowing us back into it to eventually take over and finish as the stronger side. The result, until Andy Carroll’s back header in the 87th minute, was always in doubt and the singing of “You’ll Never Walk Alone” was a song of relief as well as celebration.
Anthony, 25, has pleaded not guilty to killing her daughter Caylee and says a baby-sitter kidnapped her. After a massive search, the girl’s body was found seven months after her June 2008 disappearance. It was discovered by a meter reader in some woods about a quarter of a mile from the home mother and daughter had shared with Anthony’s parents and brother. Detectives said residue of a heart-shaped sticker was found on duct tape over the mouth of her skull.
It was Jim's intention for the band to be a four piece with bass, drums, two guitars and atleast two leads singers. He naively believed they could be the next Beatles. So the next point of order was to scour a battle of the bands that they were playing and find another guitar player/singer. He found a match in Marty Ross, who was the leader of a Rockford, IL band called The Look. Declaring that The Wigs had much better songs than his current band, Jim suggested Marty come see them play the following week in Kenosha. Marty obliged, and sure enough, the fully formed four-piece Wigs debuted at Marquette University in Milwaukee a week after that.
Moving on to Chepstow, a mansion owned and maintained by the Newport Preservation Society. It, and all its furnishings, were bequeathed to the Preservation Society in 1986. Today it looks much the same as it did in 1986--lots of florals, antiques, & ruffles. More info available here.
Then the rapture craze began. My balcony became the rapture balcony because I outfitted it so that I could comfortably watch all the people being raptured. One day while in Goodwill I found my….
Down she came and found a boat
All good Romance has to have an HEA - a Happily Ever After ending.
And now that I’ve done my first reading from a published Safe Harbor — this past Thursday at Crime Writers of Canada’s fabulous Arthur Ellis shortlist event — I’m primed to read at the launch.
PUBLIC/PRIVATE
Just Malaysians wanting to be heard. You didn’t give them a stadium. They took over the city. The People 1 – the Govt 0.
Somehow because the woman chose to stay home, it also became her JOB to take care of the entire house.
FACT: Executives from all Fortune 500 companies are on LinkedIn.
The Spicy Fish Floss (Serunding Ikan)
So here is the sketch we were given.
Bedecked in precious jewels,
-neck breaker by Punk.
As you can see, I have several books about drawing or painting flowers. I just pulled out three that I hadn't looked at in years and began flipping through the pages...but I went back to my old stand-by. There's something about the shape of the petals I drew that is so ingrained in me that I think I could draw them in my sleep! My hand automatically wants to make that shape when I think flowers.
"Oh hay!"
‘The ICRC condemns in the strongest possible terms this barbaric act,’ ICRC Director-General Yves Daccord said in a statement. ‘All of us at the ICRC and at the British Red Cross share the grief and outrage of Khalil’s family and friends.’
The recommendation did not go unseen, and all the good words did not fall on deaf ears! If it wasn’t for our loyal “fans” none of this would have been possible.
a seat on the patio, eating s’mores
Crying, 'Get up, little Alice! it is day.'
the water poured kitchen ceiling during rain and the heating did not work.
Churchill’s Cabinet first discussed immigration on 25th November 1952 when he asked in Cabinet if the Post Office employed large numbers of “coloured workers”. “If so, there was some risk social problems would be created.” They were from India, Nigeria, the Gold Coast, Sierra Leone, Uganda, Mauritius, West Indies, Ceylon, British Guiana and Malaya.
Kids There will be no next time B
After completing step #8 the issue may be resolved. If you continue to see the same problem restart the computer. You may also need to follow the steps below to correct the file association error message.
Nicole Borgenicht is a children's fiction writer. Her most recent picture book is The Bridge published by Publish America. Some of Nicole's other kid's stories have appeared in The Los Angeles Times Kid's Reading Room section, Stories for Children Magazine and LadyBug Flights Magazine. Additional works comprise poetry and essays, short stories, one act plays or articles in magazines such as Arts and Entertainment Skyline
All 3 seasons and the movie (not so great, but fun if you get into it and great if you've got a six-pack on hand) are available on Netflix insty and I'm betting that 5-10 minutes of hardcore Youtubing will probably net you the same thing.
Polygonum tinctorum
As I have written this over the past couple of months, I’m disappointed that I cannot offer a real solution to this problem. I wish that I had the answers for Uganda and those of you who are interested in doing something to help the people there. Unfortunately, I feel that I have done little more than to highlight problems there and then problems with our response to their problems. I learned so much while I was there, but I still have a lot that I can learn." It is true that we should not be fooled or taken a back by fancy editing and sleek camera skills. However we should also not let people stop us from supporting causes that we feel strongly for. If you continue to want to back the 'Invisible Children' and 'Kony 2012' then please do so as it is completely up to you but it is always good to hear different points of view. When supporting a cause you should always allow both sides of a story to be clear in your mind. Only this way can you have the up-most trust in your decisions. I am in no way trying to tell you that 'Kony 2012' is wrong or that the 'Invisible Children' do not deserve your following, Facebook Picture, tweet or donation I am merely sharing opinions on the subject that I feel should be addressed and listened to. Once you have done so - Then feel free to pledge and what not but don't let a Fancy film take your breath away like it initially did mine.
I’ve confessed to not being a particularly ardent baseball fan. But I am a fan of sports in general. And, also, I’m a guy so everything that happens in the sports world somehow eventually filters through to my brain, where it is immediately stored away for later use at any gathering where there is at least one (1) other guy present and during games of Trivial Pursuit.
Fiskars- bold flowers 8x8
P.S. for local peeps: Z. Gallerie is having a Pre-Grand Opening Extravaganza at the new Shops of Willow Bend location tonight from 6-8pm! They'll have refreshments (fingers crossed for cupcakes!) and you can enter to win $100 gift cards. I hope to stop by and check out their new Spring/Summer Collection, and take advantage of 15% off all art and accessories! Anyone else going?
It is for a Sew Spoiled Bundle Pattern Package of 4!! That means the winner will choose 4 Sew Spoiled Patterns from my Etsy Shop. Simply post a comment on this blog post to enter to win.
It’s also going to make it damn-near impossible for future generations to decipher love letters from WWII, time capsules unearthed with handwritten letters to the finders, every doctor’s set of notes ever written, journals and diaries, and I weep for what else.
I feel though to a lesser degree the Beano and Dandy should use there artists more..Laura H should for example be given another page other than one a week..just my views..etc..
The guy who did the happiness survey believes that happiness isn’t easy to evaluate, but that, ultimately, people will just claim the happiest place to live is wherever the live.
“… but without parrots on their shoulders,” I added.
If I had another life ahead of me.
I Can't Be Counted On
I made the reservations through “Open Table” the online service that “No 9 Park” uses.
Another of the things I've been banging on about is the UK actually taking notice of their place in the world and cutting their cloth accordingly. Our economy is on the way down and we need to plan our finances on that future prospect and plan forward, not hanging on to the glory of the past.
Karma Chameleon…Culture Club
He spoke about what he could offer me, in a way I’ve never heard before, he actually began with honesty and just an ear. He listened before he spoke to me offering advice, and believe me, the more wedding preps are coming to the fore front of life, listening is the biggest lesson I’m learning of all!
3My heart was hot within me, while I was musing the fire burned: then spake I with my tongue,
Health Benifits Of Drinking Water
Casey Anthony is accused and being charged with the murder of her 3 year old daughter Caylee Marie Anthony. Her body was discovered in a park a few blocks from her mothers home.
Last night, I had a rough and rowdy sex with a guy I’ve just met in PlanetRomeo. The sex was a bit sado-masochistic with a surplus of insults and curses but less the chains and leather. I actually find it sexy, arousing and exciting. A perfect blend of fear and lust, elements that make your hormones swoon over your judgment.
With good, watertight plastic so scarce these days, Rel counted the bottles as raw wealth. There were enough for every town in the First Realm to get a few, and he thought he could see another rack deeper in the darkness. He said, "Do you think they know all this stuff is in here?"
First up, these babies…I know they don’t look like much now with their gaudy red paint, but I am hoping to channel some of Holly's talents and paint them white or grey depending..
: : we celebrated my sweet sisters birthday :)
Walk in the woods in Florida with the folks...
In life, it is the unexpected that makes it interesting. I did expect to be scared. I also expeted to regroup, after all that is what I do everytime I race. I didn't expect the admiration. Let's face it, the Wharton's (my family) are obviously not fans of motorcycles. But they are fans of talent and quality. So I found myself feeling unexpectedly comfortable and at home, as I rode on a premier piece of machinery under the expert care of my friend.
I wrote this poem in the midst of one such adult style tantrum that no one would know about if I didn't 'fess it all up here on this blog. But you can't appreciate the happy if you haven't felt the despair. So this anger is the snowfall, and then after that comes the sun to melt it. Yes always the sun comes again. Always it comes. So make the dance of anger a fast one, get through it and move on to the sunny slow dance of silence and peace.
I don't necessarily have to yell to be heard.
What I like about the book is that it is built to be used in everyday life. She has scripted various phrases that you would use in your normal speaking- what clothes will you wear, meal time phrases, play time, etc. So you learn the phrases and practice them as you are doing that activity. There are also some fun games at the end of the book that help them remember the words they have learned.
Pleasing God – The themes of holiness, love and the return of Jesus are foreshadowed in Paul’s prayer and act as a transition from apologetic to exhortation. *The goal of Paul in this section is to please God ,which follows with the Old Testament[5]*.
The vineyards are planted with Malbec, Cabernet Sauvignon, and Cabernet Franc, and their first vintage was 2003, when they only produced 11 barrels of wine. The vineyard is certified organic and should be certified biodynamic by Demeter next year. Ernesto also owns vineyards in other areas of Argentina, including Valle de Uco, Agrelo, La Consulta, Vistaflores and Rivadavia. In addition, he purchases grapes from about 150 different suppliers, only two which are biodynamic, and most with which they work closely with to ensure the quality of the grapes. You will also find numerous animals wandering the premises, including horses, cows, and llamas.
Do you know some of the self employment costs strippers might have?…
Saturday morning, and it was time to leave this beautiful island, I felt quite a pang of sadness as we boarded the ferry from Port Ellen, back to the mainland.
I am grateful for this little corner of our hallway with the round window that floods with light at this time of day.
Much of the rest of the day was taken up with lively constructive workshops that put service users & providers together with policy makers until they had thrashed out some positive suggestions for dealing with the current problems. Contacts were made – email addresses exchanged. I attended the Flourish House workshop showcasing their Clubhouse model. It was hosted admirably by Paul Mulgrew & Leah Middleton, Senior Project Worker for the project, who went on to invite Simon Francis of The Department of Works and Pensions to visit to see the work being done there. Hopefully he will be able to take them up on this offer. Time will tell if the links made during the conference will come to anything more substantial.
Here’s a list of some of the non-profit groups that donate money to the IoM. Note the presence of all the corporatists and globalists:
“Don’t worry!” God told me—has been telling me since Wednesday, or probably before that. “I am all you need!” He’s right, of course. As usual. I think he thought it was time to get it through my head.
1/4 cup Maida
6.) Name the one comic/book character that you loved the most and why ?
Factory Records Fac 23
Yoochun stay still when his member already buried in Junsu hole. He waits for Junsu to get used to his size and calm down. He pat his wife’s stomach to make him calm.
Instead, here we are, not a single post in months !!
Who's Gonna Save My Soul--Gnarls Barkley
“The girls were great last night, Ryan is an all star. Overall, a very good show, I’ll be sure to call ya next year if we rent a house up there again.”
it seems
‘None of this bill is being voted on by the people of Kansas. It’s being forced upon them by a group of conservative extremists who want to control the reproductive choices of women. If this bill passes the Senate, Governor Brownback has already stated that he will sign it, even though he hasn’t read it’.
Throughout the Old Testament, God communicates through ordinary people, such as Moses, Abraham, and Noah. or through prophets, such as Isaiah and Jeremiah. God didn’t send warm fuzzy 140- character Twitter-style messages, but used the voice of others to tell his people to “shape up or ship out,” or to give hints of the good life to come through the promised Messiah.
However as my curiosity mounted and I grew tired of the same old drab sweet potato soup I decided to live on the wild side and splurge the €1.20 on acquiring one of these strange-looking things; I heard rumblings on the web that they were great in soup.
Lex Murphy's group of friends have all dated, hated, ignored and lusted after each other for the last few years. If only there was a way of matching people perfectly to avoid all the unrequited love, dumping and drama! Then Lex's friend George is given a mysterious Sims-like game by his software-testing dad which involves building character profiles in the categories of Life, Looks and Love. Lex and George populate the game with avatars for all their mates, making a few 'wishful thinking' adjustments to the settings - and find that the next day these tinkerings have come true! But how long can this new calm, loved-up atmosphere continue?"
Pour out all but 1/3 cup of the cooking liquid. Add the jalapeno, spinach, and red onion. Cook over low heat for 2-3 minutes, or until spinach is wilted.
(b) be in a position that minimises smoke from the area entering any area where smoking is prohibited; and
When you follow the action, do you pan or hold it steady?
I have worn legwarmers in the winter months since moving to Philly about eight years ago. Because I am from Southern California. We aren't bred for real winters. I invested in two identical basic black thigh-high pairs so that I'd always have a back-up when the other was in the laundry pile. They certainly weren't trendy when I started wearing them. And they rarely showed, because I'd wear them under my jeans, pants, or skirts, and only for the purpose of not being cold.
This was a very sweet romance that you needn’t be ashamed to share with your teenaged daughter or your grandmother, yet there’s enough sparks to satisfy anyone. If you are looking for a great beach read, then DADDY’S LITTLE MATCHMAKERS is a book you’ll want to consider. Discussion questions are included at the end. $5.75. 217 pages.
At midlife, the social ‘script’ insists that we’re supposed to adopt a rueful tone–Oh, that first crow’s foot, that first strand of gray. It’s simply more acceptable for women to be self-deprecating about the signs of aging. But when was the last time you heard an older woman say, in public–’Actually, getting older is more than tolerable–it’s great!’ Let alone: ‘I really like it.’
For me, then, it becomes not something which deals with simply the clothes, or of any romantic or sexual pursuits, for these are not realms which hold bearing to me what-so-ever. For me, the feminine realm simply becomes a sociological one which allows me to be able to express my own sense of self in a way which is consistent with my inner sense of self. It is not quantifiable in any sense of the imagination but it is continually justified by the way in which the world around me relates to me when I am so presenting. And in that relational experience with the world, it all just *feels* correct in a way that it never did for the past 40 cognizant years of my own life.
After that, things became pretty much of a blur …
Mr. Charles Biro, identified as "an editor of comic books", stated vigorously "that comic books are getting better". Biro was an editor, writer and artist at that time for Lev Gleason's line of crime comics, books that came under the harshest criticism of the critics. By cover date May/48 Gleason had published a "code" of conduct to be followed in his crime comics Crime Does Not Pay and Crime and Punishment.
Date: 08/01/2010
"I made this for a special friend that just received word she is now cancer-free. She deserves so much more than a ribbon after the battle she fought. She wears something pink on herself everyday, and I thought maybe she might want something a little bit more for those days she really wants to shout it out that she is a survivor!"
From this angle you can see the fabulous dimension the corrugated card gives. My wings were also cut from corrugated card and painted with a black Paint Dabber.
The campaign by the Democratic Alliance Student Organisation (DASO) features a topless white man and black woman embracing. The poster, which is an advert of the organization’s 2012 membership campaign, also comes with the tagline:
It's just five of us bloggers total (a perfectly sized group) and our day included a tour of the Waterbury factory, a meeting with Quality Control and Manufacturing, a meeting with Jostein Solheim (CEO of B&J), ScoopU (I am getting to be a pro at the 3oz scoop!), playtime in Research and Development, and a chance encounter with Ben and Jerry themselves. Photos to follow!
Sugar Glider
5.Serve hot with butter, coconut oil, honey, pure maple syrup, or fruit.
You want to go get it for me?"
Also, in general, there are many different loadings (as I said above, that means different bullet weights, and different powder charges), at many different power levels, for most chamberings.
- Add mashed bananas. Mix until combined.
Several weeks ago I heard about the Walking School Bus (even though they have apparently been around for a while...since 2005? Who knew!). Have you heard of them? I think it's a great idea. Groups of children (and parents) get exercise and meet new people while they walk to school together. They are not only saving the environment, but improving their lives through exercise.
Bus: Lothian Road to Colington Village (Lothian Buses, 10)
You see, to some people it may just be a crib. But to me, to me it's the end of a chapter. Kind of like a chapter in a book that is so good, interesting and comforting that you just don't want it to end. One that you will remember, but can not relive. Sure there are more chapters to write, but this is one I will always cherish. The memories of my babies all snuggled up with their "blankies", "snuggles", and toys.
Not that Oswald Plummer's sitting room, curtains drawn against the soft and vibrant evening world, is silent. The sounds are of flesh sharply meeting flesh. And consequent feminine yelps and half-muffled cries. Well, a girl does her best not to cry out.
surrendering to Love, you gave it your strength.
"We don't usually judge a brew by its nutrition label, but if you're going to anyway, these are your best (and best-tasting) options rated on our beer expert's quasi-scientific pint scale, from not terrible for you to actually pretty good. Bottoms up."
After that? Who knows.
Illustrator: Ben Cort
tamil song which beats micheal learns to rock). I couldnt resist doing some moves in the car, unfortunately I was discovered..by the family in the car I just
My wee Lithuanian nurse does an ECG, takes blood, and is apologetic as she waves me off back t the general waiting area, “If dere is anythink wrong we will call you soon, but it may be awhile (shrug, pfft) dere is no more exam rooms!”
The developer blames the worldwide economy — a perfect boogeyman given today’s headlines. This casts a fog over the specific factors that killed the Carlton, namely insanely high prices. Is anyone really surprised condos at $2,000 a square foot can’t sell? This is Vancouver, not Manhattan.
My friend stayed on the scene to help and even though he performed mouth
4. Favorite and least favorite books that you read today?
This is much the same as the process in the UK, for those of you interested - the big practical difference between the Senat and the House of Lords is that the Senat has a clock which limits the amount of time each person is allowed to speak. The Senator proposing amendments can speak for 3 minutes; each person after that has 5 minutes each to put their point across. And there's a big digital red clock counting down as they talk.
2 Cute Rubber Stamps are cute and whimsical rubber and digital stamps that can be used for cards, scrapbooks and much more. Heidi is the owner/designer/illustrator and loves seeing her cute illustrations turned into rubber stamps. The BEST thing about 2 Cute Rubber Stamps is that “YOU” can get involved in the creative process by voting on her sketches and submitting ideas of your own.
"+ Here lie the remains of Rev. James Kavanagh, P.P., who departed this life January 6th, 1876, aged 67 years. In your charity pray for the repose of his soul."
There is an entire inquiry into whether a release is valid, which I won’t discuss here today. Suffice it to say, you should consult with a personal injury attorney even if there is a release, because it is a technical question. Most, if not all, personal injury attorneys provide a free consultation in personal injury cases.
The roll call of 'Tactical Flashlights' can run for page upon page, and everyone gets to chose what features they want... and can afford. Rather than run down all the brands, Lets spend some time looking at features.
to busy myself with wicked deeds
The fair Ophelia! Nymph, in thy orisons
The local alternatives fall in the realm of “not so good” as far as housekeeping goes. It is not as if I cannot do the work. It is, however, much easier to indicate the base boards need attention or the drapery valiance should have a good cleaning – to mention little of the refrigerator has dripping blood from a carelessly tipped left over steak.
I have to admit that not all of my injuries are sustained on the proverbial wagon. There was the time I came back from holiday with a bruise on my arse so lurid that it apparently 'looked as though I'd sat in a punnet of blackberries'. If memory serves me right, that was thanks to a particularly toxic series of cocktails in a bar in Greece and my subsequent descent down a flight of concrete stairs with an amply cushioned but painful landing. Then there was the Sambuca stigmata (easy to do if you haven't read the instructions), the dislocated toe (showing off by kicking a wheel, as you do), the traumatised cocyx (doing the can-can with both legs at the same time - people in Bristol still talk about it), a broken toe (dropping a particularly heavy glass on it whilst trying to drink some water to prevent a hangover - there's no justice) and a black eye sustained when I ran into someone's benignly outstretched fist during a fire alarm.
The MailOnline would have us believe that not one of those 367 people who were sufficiently interested to rate Bob Roberts' comment, not one of them was inspired to leave a few words of their own? If you believe that you should not be using the nurse's computer when she is not looking.
It’s OK!
The story is that of several Pennsylvania steel worker friends and what happens when three of the them are proudly shipped off to Vietnam and leave their small blue collar town behind. After being captured POW’s and facing the horror of what a POW goes through they struggle to return home and find any sense of normalcy.
Twopenny? Does he have any idea what twopenny is? It's a very old Scottish type that was give a special status by the act of Union. It existed as a separate tax category until 1802. In its final days the tax was 3s 4d per barrel, while Strong Ale was 10/- and small Beer 1s 4d. So it was probably about 1045º. The name comes from the price per Scottish pint, which was about 4 English pints. Nothing to do with 60/-. It's easy enough to work out the retail price:
Instead of being buoyed aloft in the Aethers purely by steam, it is ardently hoped that one is also capable of being uplifted by somewhat indecorous humour; fun-pokery, and on occasion, a certain lack of seriousity.
STEVEN FURTICK
“introduce trainees (and teachers unfamiliar with technology) to the issues, both pedagogical and technical, as well as to offer them a safe environment to dip their toes into the world of web 2.0 and educational technology.”
Music Hall originated in the song taverns attached to inns and licensed premises. Some were simple affairs just an up turned box for the artist with the customers sitting drinking around it. Admission was often in the form of a refreshment check/wet money which was returnable as a drink to the value of the check. Entertainers were engaged by the landlords of these inns to entertain customers in the singing room. The singing room or music hall often grew more important than the inn to which it was attached and the latter lapsed into obscurity.
Epitaph written by Jonathan Swift
For more information, you may contact: Kathy Palmer
7. Will to Love – 7:11
It is adorned with mementos from each person
Suddenly I found a whole community of people over at www.he-man.org and other places around the net who were basically keeping the franchise alive. You’d be hard pressed to find a better fan base for any property from the 80′s. Of course I jumped in and grabbed as many Classics figures as I could afford. They are FUCKING AWESOME. They are sculpted by a group of toy makers called ‘The Four Horsemen’ who are fantastic at what they do.
“But what does it mean?”
In the last post, we noted that the political response of the US public to high gasoline prices is, how shall we say it, more severe than the political response to high healthcare costs. And therein poses a dilemma for progressives.
*Different types of sugar give variety of flavors to your cooking (molasses, honey, brown sugar, etc.)
- They rebel to get noticed or accepted.
WWAY News Channel 13
While each of these explanations is quite different from the others, they all represent an important turning point in the history of human ideas. They represent the birth of metaphysics–the branch of philosophy that deals with understanding and explaining the fundamental nature of the world–the “essence” of things. No longer would Homer and Hesiod’s accounts of the gods suffice as an explanation for how mankind and the world came into being.
I love it when I get lucky.
Pilgrim is a slacker who plays in a band. After meeting a girl, Ramona Flowers, he decides he has to win her over and sets about trying to make her his girlfriend – despite the fact he already has one.
With my fancy new Sky+ HD system installed, I realised last night that in order to see Match of the Day 2, I wouldn't need to suffer through the agony of Sportscene Scotland with it's less than stimulating coverage of the less than stimulating SPL. No, I could simply select one of the alternative BBC regional channels and skip straight to the highlights of Liverpool Vs Everton and Manchester United at Spurs.
like none of this ever happened. I seriously look
Speech by Paul Weston
I really really love the clean look of linen in all of these photos. And I like the idea of three panels.
As for e-books - what can you say, welcome to the future. It’s going to dominate without question. There is no reason why a self publisher can’t compete head on. Provided you put your work through a professional pipeline and make it the best it can be. It should sit shoulder to shoulder with traditionally published books with little or no difference in physical quality. All you need is great content and to market it. Check out mine on the Kindle store and compare it to a traditional book, there is ZERO difference in appearance, and because it’s been through the mill, the content matches many traditional books out there. But don’t take my word for it, see for yourself. You can try the free 10% sample the Amazon Kindle store gives away with every book, but be warned, you’ll want to buy it! :-)
Posers aside, the best part (if there is one) of going to a bike rally is just looking around. People, bikes, and their collected personalities come in all shapes, sizes, colors, and functions. If you like machines then just walk up and down the street. Yes, there are lots of Harleys. But they are parked next to sportbikes, power cruisers, Goldwings, custom bikes, and cobbled together Dr. Frankenstein two-wheeled visions. People range in age from a few months to what looks like a few hundred years. This year I saw a guy with a customized Honda Trail 70. SWEET!! In 4th Grade my Dad brought home a beat to hell blue one and that was my introduction to motorized two-wheeled transit. Didn’t go more than 20 miles per hour, smoked like a Jersey barfly, and looked like it had been dragged behind a truck. Been in love ever since.
The florist wire was long so I doubled it up from the bottom and twisted it, which makes it more sturdy.
Sorry about the shadow on the picture
The Boys in the Band – The Libertines
Judge Reinhold – Brad Hamilton
You see, son, mommy had an affair. I considered leaving everything behind, even you, for another man. Yeah, that’s a bit of a doozy. A pretty recent doozy, as I remember with trembling even now…
Our third major stop was my favorite, as anyone who knows me could have guessed. Alcazar, the castle in Segovia, is often described as a fairytale castle. I can’t disagree. The pointed towers and pale stone make it look just as you might picture a castle in a fantasy tale to appear.
When it was deemed we needed a new design to replace the old Houses of Parliament, which had been damaged by fire, a competition was organised for the best design which was won by Charles Barry, with influence from Pugin. Each competitor in the design competition had an individual logo and Charles Barry’s logo was the Portcullis, which became the symbol of Parliament – that logo is an iconic symbol of our Houses of Parliament and used on all the headed paper of our Members of Parliament It is in green for the Commons and red for the Lords. Now a twit has decided the Portcullis symbol is not right as he thinks it is seen by the public as a gate to keep them out.
Happy Fabric Tuesday! I'm linking up over at Quilt Story.
The syndicated television series, Everyday Health, profiles The Miracle Project in an episode on January 28 which unites families living with Autism alongside legendary musician Stephen Stills and actor/comedian Jack Black—with a common goal of raising funds and awareness for Autism.
There's also been a bit of facing up to Facebook and squeaking back at Twitter, plus other distractions such as writing events and holidays and work and combing the cat. All work as excellent reasons for staying away from the Blogger New Post page.
I am not sure if i mentioned this on my blog before but I have gone back to school. I am trying to prove that you CAN teach old dogs new tricks. I am taking the EMT class being offered by North Memorial Hospital. It is quite extensive and honestly I have bitten off more than I can chew! Oh well - I can and will do it!!
His political career saw him become a top-ranking ANC official in the Department of Foreign Affairs (1998). Even then this gangster found it hard to stay out of prison, as it was while he was working as an official in this department that he got himself arrested again, on 9 March 1998, by Mozambican police in Ressano Garcia, outside Maputo, for alleged gun-smuggling and espionage.
Bloomberg is a businessman, a global guy. He's not a New York guy. No true-blooded New Yorker would think getting the Olympics for the City was a cool idea. A real New Yorker would think "What a pain in the ass! Who needs that international crap to make us look good? We're already the greatest city on Earth."
The denormalisation of drinking isn’t in my view a theoretical conspiracy, but an observable fact. In most places of work it is unacceptable to go for a lunchtime pint. Most people would not tell their boss they went out for a drink in the evening lest they be thought of negatively as a boozer. Most of the media coverage regarding alcohol is by and large negative and highlights the many social and individual costs of drinking. This is not to say those costs do not exist but appear out of proportion to their occurrence. The denormalisation of drinking is well underway and to support minimum pricing is to support one of its foundations, a strategy taken from the denormalisation of smoking.
After each year’s Peace Prize is announced, the lovely people at the Nobel Peace Center have only a few weeks to create an exhibition in time for the Laureates to open it. This year’s exhibition is called SHEROES. http://nobelpeacecenter.org/english/?did=9087488
I will be leaving on November 23, 2011 for at least a year in Tokushima, Japan.
have mesothelioma cancer paired with treatment, cosmetics
Then like I said earlier, we clean it all up at the end of each day. You wake up with a clean slate so no matter how messy it gets it is doable. At 5:00 I announce it is time to clean up. After they say they are finished we get in a line and march around the house. I shout, "March! March! March! Halt!" We stop suddenly crashing into each other and I point, "pick up that sock in the corner!" or, "Elijah, straighten those books!" then the rest of us keep marching while he runs to do it then get back in line. We go all over the house like that until it is all picked up and tidy. The house gets cleaned, we are having fun together, everyone loves it.
Thank you to everyone who has supported me along the way, to everyone who has welcomed me home with open arms. None of this would have been possible without you.
But with this indoctrination into the workplace comes the classic mistake that many company’s make of being so eager to introduce tablets into their business that they fail to adequately plan – from not researching ahead of time how workers can best use the devices, to underestimating the costs and the additional challenges tablets present for IT networks – and everything in between.
I really wanted to make a full insulated lining. Two things helped my change my mind: We live in Louisiana - it seldom gets cold enough here to really need a full lining; and, I didn't have enough fabric (see above warning).
The same has to be said of Practical Magic. I loved this movie, with it’s realistic slant on magic, the unnervingly undead boyfriend and the wonderfully attractive cop character. The combination of Sandra Bullock and Nicole Kidman so delighted me that I poured over the pages of Alice Hoffman’s novel in search of more of their antics; of scenes that hadn’t made it to the screen. In truth I barely found a ghost of the movie on it’s pages. When I was done the novel and I grumbled silently in my disappointment, discarded the book and rewatched the movie to ease the pain.
Some simple graphics which the BBPA published earlier this week to to visually highlight the positive things our industry does for this country & how successive hikes in beer duty (Beer Duty Escalator) are causing irreversible damage to the beer industry in the UK & how you the responsible UK beer drinker are contributing 40% of ALL the beer duty receipts in Europe.
Drain pasta well, then add pasta back to the large pot. Pour in the entire jar of pasta sauce and mix to incorporate. Then add in the tofu ricotta and mix well again.
Plath chooses to tell Esther’s story in a first person narrative which makes it a very personal and emotional journey for any reader. The writing is simple and clean, yet poignant and soulful. Once you know Esther, you will never forget her.
to give something back to you,
Its stressful. Very stressful. We have had to sacrifice a lot of things in order to pay for this renovation – vacations have gone on hold, my closet is a mess and we are surviving on the kindness of grandparents to avoid pricey childcare fees for the little fella.
It’s amazing to think that once images like this had to be created by artists. Now the artist is a spacecraft, and the views are real!
Home is the first place where kids learn habits, routines, values and beliefs. So parents should set an example for their children. Show that you value diversity in your friendships and business relationships. Buy books, music, videos and toys that reflect diversity. Teach your child about the injustices of bias and discrimination. Speak up when someone makes a racist or ethnic joke, and explain to your child that those types of remarks promote cultural tensions.
We had about an hour before dinner after our friend left so my girlfriend wanted a 25pt game to kick my ass. We went for some weird containers as scenery and played the Overrun scenario. I played again with a list I’m practicing with for an upcoming 25pts random couples scenarios. Basically it’s very high armor up front and not a single NON-weapon master model in the army. Matched with pButcher’s feat it’s overkill pretty much on anything. I’m thinking I’ll bring the hammer, lets hope the random pairing brings the anvil. I can swap him for eSorscha for a little less overkill (but not a lot) and some more spells, or the one I’m most tempted, pIrusk, to hit hard and make the feat turn a pain for the opponent, while putting Superiority on one of the jacks.
the demons they were hoping to invite
The THIRD bar will be 8-9pm, a few steps down 4th street. Hint: It's a 'ghostly' room for sure!
Thankfully my mum was able to call CAA and they showed up fairly quickly. After much berating and head shaking from every man who passed me standing by my car I finally was able to grab my keys, pay for my gas and drive away as quickly as possible. Special thanks to my mum who came to keep me company while I waited.
When times get tough (you know, like now…) government won’t be there for you to lean on. It Will Be Too Busy Leaning On You.
After a very busy weekend meeting lots of new people at the Bulli Show my partner and I decided that neither of us were up to preparing dinner on sunday night, so we decided to eat out instead. This is where Ciao Mediterranean Restaurant and Pizzaria came in. You see as I have mentioned before we are a big fan of various coupons deals as these provide some great value and a fantastic way to try the seemingly endless array of restaurants in the Illawarra area. After a quick check of our assortment of coupons, Ciao caught our eye and so we made a last minute booking for an outside table based on the lovely weather that we had been treated to that day. Unfortunately when we arrived at Ciao following sun set the reality that it was only the start of spring set in and we decided to change to an inside table. The restaurant was quite busy for a sunday night but the lovely wait staff were able to arrange another table inside and even suggested that we move to a better table when one became available after a short period of time.
As he kissed me.
All-inclusives also tie you an opportunity to stray away from our American comfort zone and familiar hotels – Hilton, Marriott, etc. – and discover international brands such as Sandals, AMResorts, Riu and Iberostar.
Rodgers and Hammerstein figured out, even before they started working together, that musicals can be realistic. Hammerstein's Show Boat dealt with alcoholism, inter-racial marriage, gambling addiction, domestic abuse, and more. Rodgers' Pal Joey was about a two-bit night club singer who uses women until they figure out he's using them. But both R&H seemed to think that musical theatre could be naturalistic too.
The larger chains today carry much more than just literature. Browse the music, DVD, and magazine sections. Get to know each other better by discussing your favorite choices in reading material or film.
I’ve never been a member of a gym, for a host of reasons…all of which are mental hangups of one sort or another. I’m wondering if you had any misgivings or reluctance that you had to work through when you *first* started using a gym? And if you did, do you have any tips on getting over a mental block and taking that leap?
It comes up like a couple more times and… just never gets explained. Maybe something about Mana inside her? There’s nothing there, barely even a handwave explanation. Inori having this psycho other self barely even becomes a plot point, so why is it even fucking there?
Ha, you can see my toes in the bottom of the photo, heeheehee. Each of the canvases is 6” x 8” and since I live in a rental, I will use the Command Strips to place them on the wall in my little studio.
Don't forget: Today is the last day to enter my giveaway for 1 month of free advertising on my blog. If you have an Etsy store, design-related biz or blog, click here for details.
Æther Adept works as your main removal in this deck, I originally had two Mist Ravens instead of the Emancipation Angel and that is probably a better idea if you want to work this deck somewhat more competitively. But this way, it’s more fun!
A subsequent amendment appears to get the number of claims to below 100.
The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints reported an increase from 4,224,026 U.S. members in 2000 to 6,144,582 members in 2010, a 45.5 percent jump.
It was timely that Troy and Carreen were here during the holidays because Miguel and I went up to our fourth level roof to watch the fireworks. The only access to the roof is via a long ladder propped against the edge of the wall. Up on that terrace are our water tanks. And nothing else. So when the ladder fell when we tried to come down after the fireworks, we were rather stranded. Nobody available to come and help us at 12:15 on New Year's Eve, no hidden key in case a neighbor could be roused, and no piece of rope. Nothing.
But who ever said that because a novel is 'made up', it shouldn't have a particular stance? And when did a good novel never inform us, provide a searing insight? Ah, but what are we talking about here, of course, are things like the understanding of economics, the things about which we've become intellectually disenfranchised. And novels just aren't cutting it in that regard, they are - tut tut - only telling us about the human condition! There is something, though, I'd say, in what Williams quotes Lanchester as saying: 'In general, the literary novel has turned slightly too far away from the things that press on people. It is an utterly bizarre place to have ended up, but if the subject of a novel is too interesting, that's not literary enough.'
of your life, till all you thought you knew
You end the week on a high.
The forms for school that were filled out and turned in on time?
the Drive By Truckers show, the Basilica bells began to chime, and the
i agree with sally that it does most definitely depend on the circumstances of your loss. nothing would or could have saved my baby. but if i'd known that earlier intervention could have saved it, i don't think my reasoning would hold true. if i'd had appointments in my pregnancy when the midwife had listened to the heartbeat and i had heard it too, the idea of a doppler would almost certainly be more reassuring.
On the day Fabrice Muamba made his first public appearance since he suffered a cardiac arrest when these two teams met in the FA Cup in March, Spurs produced a ruthless display of finishing to keep them fourth in the Premier League.
Sophia- Melissa McCarthy (Bridesmaids) would have to go blond, but she’d kill it.
For anyone, besides me, who has been living in a cave for the past few weeks, George Zimmerman is the guy who chased, confronted, fought and then shot a sixteen-year-old kid by the name of Trayvon Martin.
But within the structure of this fractured family........
AWWWHHHHH WILL.
two houses and two sets
I’m elated when folks tell me they’ve enjoyed visiting tugster over the years. Well, I’m as thrilled when you send in fotos other places beyond the sixth boro, all accessible ultimately from the the sixth boro. In fact, the whole world awaits once you’ve gone out the Narrows or through Hall Gate.
So, I had no choice but to give my neurons some activity to do since they won’t shut up. Made them conjure up a portrait of Natalie Portman using pencils and pastel sticks which I just got from Daiso, a really handy store that sells almost everything under the sun at the lowest price of RM5.
DROP by the shop this month and cast any Orvis Helios, Access or Clearwater fly rod and get $10 Orvis discount coupon card.
At the moment Cosatu is still allied to the ANC in the tripartite alliance, but if Malema should ever become president Cosatu will have the choice -- become a lapdog, or follow the Zimbabwe trade unions into the political wilderness, and form an equivalent of the MDC.
Lord I thank you! We complain a great deal over soo little when God has given us SOO much and made provision to SUSTAIN us! We must realize that we have been very ungrateful and it MUST stop….
Rejoicing should manifest itself in the way i live my life. With gentleness, not worry and anxiousness. With a peace that surpasses the situation and limited understanding. With a grace that extends itself to others instead of unleashing our burdens and anxiety on those around us.
HAMUUL: Who?
And don’t worry, I will be fine.
9. Be Still
Drink update:
Please come take a look at the challenge blog if you haven't already seen it, you could be in with a chance of winning a trial set of PanPastels worth £11.99 from our fabulous sponsor Your Creativity Store. They have a wide range of artist materials and well worth a look.
smoking policy – As much as I consider myself a smoker and the fact that I could hae had a million to kill this never ending day, I plan on not smoking during work hours, I know I smoked during parts of my induction but most of those times were in the evening. I don’t want to get branded as a smoker as you never know what other connotations that may have. SO this will just make life easy and also make this talk also redundant
Everything turned out okay for my roommate in the end, her family all being okay. Same with all the Japanese exchange students at my school, which totaled 5. Right after that, I ended up getting accepted to Kansai Gaidai University for the Fall semester. My parents were still skeptical about sending me to Japan after the earthquake, but I assured them that everything would be okay because Kansai Gaidai was in the South. I traveled to Japan at the end of August and stayed there until almost the end of December. During that time, I didn’t see any direct affects of the earthquake where I was or traveled, but there was always a sort of somber atmosphere when talking to international students and Japanese students about what had happened over a half a year prior.
How did it turn out? The oatmeal was thick, creamy, and just a touch salty (exactly how I like it), while the apples and dates added just the right amount of sweetness. The best bites were the ones with some crunchy toasted pecan, and when I make this again, I’ll probably add more nuts.
When I saw you again, you were old enough to have sex. So I covered your naked body with my own robe. Then I solemnly promised that you would belong to me and that I … would take care of you. I washed the blood off you and rubbed your skin with olive oil. I gave you the finest clothes and the most expensive robes, as well as sandals made from the best leather. I gave you bracelets, a necklace, a ring for your nose, some earrings, and a beautiful crown. Your jewelry was gold and silver, and your clothes were made of only the finest material and embroidered linen. Your bread was baked from fine flour, and you ate honey and olive oil. You were as beautiful as a queen, and everyone on earth knew it.
Nutella.
Above: "My Boyfriend Scales Walls" topped with "Shatter the Scales".
~As you prepare each ingredient, focus your energy on imbuing each with the energy of their desired purpose for your spell. Actually visualise the energy as a white, or appropriately colored light around the object. Then 'see' that light grow intensely bright, and then merge with the natural energy of the object. (This takes about 20-30 seconds for each.)
Some days I am content to go through the motions. Some days I want to make as little effort as possible to get by, and I’m alright with being mediocre, and if we’re being frank some days I’m just proud to survive and get to the end of the day. This morning is already shaping up to be one of those mornings. I force myself through small talk and the first few songs in the worship set, I scribble out prayer requests for “financial security, whatever the heck that looks like,” and drop them in the offering plate without any money because we don’t have any money and then I feel guilty for not giving in faith that God would provide for us and I mentally resign from the morning because it just started and already I’m done, I’m over it.
Outside of my comfort zone.......
What's entertaining is all the girls are like "Ooo, secret admirer!" (I wish) and all the guys are like "Who's fucking with you?" (more likely). I'm thinking it is a thank you for something I did, which I am not sure what I did, but thank you for thanking me, whoever you are. It's beautiful and smells wonderful.
- a glass each of sake
So bottomline: sit tight this will pass!!
Moreover, there is a corrupt element, influential in European society, which is not to be met with in the United States: this is the idle rich and the soldiers in garrison. The wealthy without professions and the soldiers without glory have nothing to do; their sole pastime is the corruption of women–impetuous, open-handed youth, in need of space and action; comparable to the flood waters of the Mississippi: beneficial when flowing freely, deadly when stagnant.
"Look, her face is so weird!"
Original Air Date: Feb 14, 2012
Siouxlou, Consider for a minute the possibility that ALEC and its backers are not so much interested in driving down teacher benefits, pensions etc as creating a more compliant teacher work force that will better assist in the pacification of each new generation. As I say, at some length, elsewhere in this threat, all this “reform” manifests itself on the kid level as simply all multiple choice all the time. And there are essay and oral answer grading programs on the horizon that will serve the same function, i.e. teaching the young that authority has all the answers, punishments and rewards.
A Little drum roll for the math, and assuming roughly 50:50 male/females, the typical family had about 55 kids. Incredible. Seemed like a lot of kids, even for Mormons. And yet, when I asked about this, I got two responses: 1) the Bible cannot be trusted because it has been translated so often by men; and 2) knock it off, why don’t you.
The present Aids-HIV epidemic -- against which the Mbeki-regime undertakes no action and still is publicly failing to properly acknowledge -- the World Health Organisation estimates that more than 6-million African South Africans will be dead within the forthcoming decade. And the Mbeki-led ANC regime, which could have undertaken a huge prevention campaign such as Uganda's a long time ago, has done nothing to stave off this terrible death rate.
Betty thought about it. “Were your cats so passionate about you?”
“Where’s your favorite spot in Malaysia? It could be anywhere.”
This is one of my favorite ways to enjoy fresh fruit in the summer. I only became familiar with aguas frescas a few years ago, but I love, love, love them. You can use the fruit of your choice when making this drink, but here are some that work really well (pineapple, watermelon, mango, cantaloupe, honeydew). I only recently tried honeydew (not my favorite melon), and it was so tasty. My son drank it right up. Aguas frescas are quite simple to make. Chop up your fruit into small pieces, add a bit of water, a tsp or sugar if needed, and blend. I'm going to link to a Food Network recipe if you want the specifics. When I lived in Texas I'd enjoy a fresh cantaloupe drink in the mornings. Sometimes the heat is so intense that it kills your appetite. This is a great way to get something into your stomach and stay cool.
The event dates: May 7 at 12:01 am to May 25 11:59pm
Try it along with me. We’ll stumble, but we’ll get back up and move on.
Forget the fact that it's an important step in our democratic dispensation. I like to think that I take heart in not voting (as I won't have my voter's ID), because I am deadset against getting a voters ID when I have yet to receive my national ID card--promised to be distributed me back in August/September 2011. Why must I vote when I don't have my National ID card yet? Why was money not sought to ensure nation-wide distribution of cards had taken place? And why did our esteemed agencies not ensure that national ID cards would be the de facto form of registration?
Where the Devil Can’t Go is a competently written thriller with a political subtext. The strength of the book is the sense of place and community relations in London, the characterisation of Janusz and Kershaw, and interweaving of the two main plots as they twist round each other and intersect. The writing is generally engaging, though the plot was a little uneven, with the first half of the book stronger than the second. The first half was very good and demonstrated Lipska’s undoubted talent as a writer. However, the time in Poland was a little rushed and underdeveloped, and the rise to the climax somewhat contrived. It’s difficult to discuss the ending without giving spoilers, but in the age of photocopiers, scanners, the internet, smart phones and so on the set-up played weakly and undermined credibility. Overall, an enjoyable read that will appeal to police procedural fans looking for something slightly different to normal fare.
"The idea is simple, select a poem you love, carry it with you, and share it with co-workers, family, and friends..."
3/12/2009 1:00 AM
From the Examiner newspaper.
He laughed--but realised that I was right---"What are we going to do with this Clyde--what do you suggest ?".
- The parent meeting that I had on Tuesday ended well because the student is no longer in my Pre AP class. It is amazing how much more productive we were this week.
Luckily, Ollie didn’t stop. Instead, in a fit of inspiration that only an uncalled-for close encounter with infinity can trigger, he found Rory’s track and pressed Play. There was a screeching, graunching, thudding, whining moan, with a thundering thump running underneath. Finally, some decent sounds, he thought. Then suddenly, Rory appeared, shaking his head and poking at his ears with his fingers.
I still haven't taken my sewing machine out of it's pretty cover, but I have done some scrapping for Challenge Heaven's Cyber Crop, and my Scrappy Sketches page. Here they are:
Yes, I realize that standardized tests like this are snapshots; they don't capture the entire picture. But they do confirm the anecdotal evidence that teachers observe and record all year long. The student data in the uppermost image represents one of the many students I've worried about from day one, when all of the traits of a reluctant reader crossed the threshold of my classroom. The student in the second image has never worried me because this student entered with a book and has kept me on my toes for recommendations ever since. Both attend class regularly, both come for loving homes, and both are genuinely nice young adults. Don't be fooled into thinking reading is a socio-economic issue. It's not. It's an issue of priorities, like everything else.
Amendment 10A, which amended the PC(USA) rules to allow for this, was passed by a vote of the presbyteries with 373 yeas, 323 nays, and 4 abstentions. Pueblo Presbytery voted nay.
Ok at least we were 20 persons.. and could all pay it together.. some didn't have money.. but it worked out anyway somehow..
Your Mitch
We have made some friends who we will be having dinner with tonight on a rooftop in Agra…. and tomorrow we are off to the Taj for Andy’s birthday…. which will be surreal and fantastic….
Between our buildings, and within the spaces themselves, is an unrelenting intensity at play between Dark Space and Light Space. However, if Dark Space is readily accepted as being as crucial to architecture and design as Light Space, addressing the benefits of both (as well as their pitfalls), it becomes a valuable use of their symbiotic spatiality.
9. bake 20 or so minutes until toothpick comes out clean.
The 36-year-old was dressed in leggings and a black cardigan for the outing. She was not joined by any of her 14 children.
They have been like this since they were little. They will argue with each other like crazy then not ten minutes later are laughing and playing and having fun. I just hope they don't continue this pattern in high school. I hope that they can learn how to work out their differences without yelling at each other. How to be not only sisters but best friends. How to respect each other and each other's belongings.
The Good
because you'll promise anything when it feels sacrificial
her ABC's - or atleast the first few and then just sings the jingle
Labors of love by their nature take some work. But you can tell the difference. In this case, you can taste the difference. Officially these morsels are called Bran Flax Muffins, but that sounds about as appealing as cardboard, so I’ve rechristened them Morning Glory Muffins, which better conveys their nutty appeal. These are like a ray of sunshine greeting you in the kitchen.
Anyone who has known me for a while can tell you I am not a shrinking violet. Even so, I feel a change in the way I am presenting myself these days. I am making more of an effort to dress nicely, even just to pop down the shops. I find myself smiling for no particular reason - I suppose when you take the time to look after yourself, your whole body wants to show it.
I figured out how wide and tall the work area was, then I spaced out thread to determine how many spools I could fit into a horizontal and vertical row.
Unfortunately most retirement planning experts agree that that picture of a senior couple on the beach in Antigua is about as realistic a picture of retirement for most people as Leave It To Beaver was of the average American families life in the 1950′s.
Photo: Welcome!
i'm so glad it is wednesday already!! it makes me sad that i have been neglecting my blog but please, please know that even though i'm not writing blogs, i am reading all of yours! i check it every day during my conference period at school :)
"In a progressive country change is constant; and the great question is not whether you should resist change which is inevitable, but whether that change should be carried out in deference to the manners, the customs, the laws and the traditions of a people, or whether it should be carried out in deference to abstract principles, and arbitrary and general doctrines".
Anyway, I had a great time, and took some pictures of my gorgeous locale.
As for pregnant or nursing moms, they do have to be a little more careful but still should eat fish to garner the substantial benefits of Omega-3s. He recommended they should eat up to 12 ounces a week of a variety of seafood, including up to 6 ounces of albacore tuna. They should though avoid the four fish that have the highest mercury levels: shark, swordfish, king mackerel, and tilefish. Plus, they should check local advisories for any fish caught by family and friends. This is all supported by the FDA and the American Heart Association.
Wine 3.0 vs Beer 3.2
Now the most important ingredient is not the Avocado, it is the "homemade ranch." I grew up on this ranch dressing and have a hard time eating the pre-made stuff out of the bottle. The "homemade ranch" is simply mayo, milk and a packet of ranch mix from Hidden Valley (or something similar). Now I use the quotations because my sweet hubby says it is not "homemade" because I am not using the fresh herbs and such, but he prefers the stuff in the bottle so I shouldn't be surprised.
liner black pen from Letraset (which is always kept in my basic tool set) to the grooms
Cast aside your fear and be thankful
Exit our sky and say good bye . ..
FOOD SPECIALS THIS WEEKEND ~
Unfortunately the subdivision behind my house doesn’t look like this. But I don’t care.
I probably would have jumped at the opportunity to never be around childbirth. I would have told you that I really just love adoption with my whole heart and birth is not my cup of tea.
7. Sink or Swim by Stacy Juba - After starring on a hit game show set aboard a Tall Ship, personal trainer Cassidy Novak discovers that she has attracted a stalker. Can she trust Zach Gallagher, the gorgeous newspaper photographer assigned to follow her for a local series?
4) Increase the speed to high, add in coffee solution and beat till smooth.
I've also heard from Pedro Navaro and he's beginning work on some more Harook goodness this week. Look for some additional releases sometime in January.
Khun Dang also state that he is concern about the quality more than profit. He only uses fresh and big oyster and mussel only. Because of the lower price but good quality, his restaurant is always clouded with customer, both repeaters and walk in customer.
No word on pricing but I suspect this beast will put you at an income disavantage for 25+ years plus interest, property tax and maintenance fees. Be sure to register so you don’t miss your chance.
So, round and round we went. At first in complete silence. Me fuming. Anna fuming. After the tenth time around the circle, Anna started giggling. I started giggling. We both burst out laughing. I took the first exit, parked and we sorted things out. Our now pact is that, when Anna says that she is lost, I will find a place to stop and we will figure out where we are.
The first book emphasises key skills applicable across the humanities, and key concepts which you will apply through the course. You will explore the origins of the ‘idea’ of material culture and approaches to describing, classifying and interpreting objects, drawing on the disciplines of archaeology, history, anthropology and ancient history. The first chapter introduces the key concepts of ‘object biography’ and the ‘life cycle of things’, by considering how late-nineteenth and early-twentieth century museums attempted to order and classify objects from across time and space. Chapter Two develops skills of close observation and description, considering different ways of writing about objects. Chapter Three broadens out to consider ways in which the historic, social and physical (or archaeological) context of objects can aid in interpreting them, focusing on the House of Menander at Pompeii as a case study. The final chapter focuses on classification, with reference to the study of ancient Athenian vases.
I heard it was pretty steamy!
You can’t sit down, you can’t sit down
About 6:30 this evening my friend and co-worker Steve texted me that Mr. Graham was over and visiting with them. Steve and his wife Kendall purchased the old Stout house here in Fort Scott and are restoring it. Mr. Graham was the son of one of the ladies that worked for the Stouts and he grew up in the home's "servant" quarters although he says he felt like a member of the family. He is a wonderful story teller and at 90 is a jewel of a person to be with. I was able to catch a few shots as he pondered and recalled the stories of his past. The final shot shows RK with Steve and Kendall.
Yea right, I thought.
There weren't too many let-downs this year for me. But I have to say my first novel taste of Alastair Reynolds, Terminal World, certainly soured me on him a bit yet I still intend to read some of his older work. Paul Hoffman's much touted The Left Hand of God started off so strongly and than degenerated into something not all that special. George Mann's Ghosts of Manhattan could have also been better in a lot of ways despite enjoying it for what pulpy fun it was. I was also mildly disappointed in Antiphon since I loved Ken Scholes's first two Psalms of Isaak books Lamentation and Canticle, so very much and have been talking them up to friends nearly non-stop. This is not to say that Antiphon is a poor read. It still kept me interested in the narrative, but I just didn't like the way a couple formerly main characters were given such back seat roles for much of the story. You can still count on me being there for Requiem next year as soon as it is out. But for every disappointment there have been a dozen books I adored. So all in all I called this a great year for genre publishing with many new stars debuting. 2011 is looking very bright as well with these new voices and many of the masters all re-entering into the fray.
“But about that day or hour no one knows, not even the angels in heaven, nor the Son, but only the Father.” Matthew 24:36
This is what I see everyday when I look in the mirror, we argue who will be out and about that day. But all in all she always wins either way. You would agree she is perfect and I feel so bad for keeping her locked up but I need to, her safety is important to me.
I don't like unnecessary vaccines. I am even leery of the normal childhood vaccines that most of us received when we were growing up and that I did choose to inflict upon my own children--only after many weeks of sleepless nights trying to come to a decision that would ultimately affect the rest of my dear one's lives. I came to believe that the whole idea of whether or not to vaccinate is a real double edged sword. On the one hand I would not want to go back in time to the days when so many of the horrible childhood diseases were still prevalent. Back in my great grandmothers youth, it was not an uncommon thing for one or more of your children not to live to see adulthood whether because they had succumbed to Scarlet Fever or Polio or any other of the horrible diseases that were still so common back then. I honestly do believe that vaccines have played a major role in bringing those diseases under control and in many cases eradicating them.
And a question lingers. As the voices of Medgar Evers and James Byrd, Jr., of Reginald Denny and the victims of the D.C. Sniper, of Nicole Brown Simpson, plus whatever old lady just got her purse snatched this week, all rise from the smoke to offer a hearty "thanks, guys" to the Hammond Maxwells that struck the first match under the cauldron way back when — a question lingers. That question:
Weed Weed!
Rodgers and Hammerstein’s groundbreaking Broadway production of Oklahoma! in 1943 might have showcased Deanna Durbin as original Laurie, but Universal refused to accept the proposal.
Other homemade gift ideas include scrapbooks, embellished photo frames, mix CD's, or a decorated t-shirt. There are also the semi-homemade kinds of gifts, such as a collection of art supplies or craft materials. The point is that it isn't about the money, and it isn't about fulfilling the specified, predetermined wishes of the birthday child. Being frugal doesn't have to seem like being thoughtless; in fact, it can be significantly more thoughtful. And in the time you would have spent braving the toy store (and your own child's inevitable desire to get something for herself while you're there), you can sit down with your child and spend some time thinking about her friend.
1. Boil the choclo (whole) and noodles in separate pans of water with a teaspoon of salt each. While those things are boiling, cut the leftover ham into small bite-size pieces. Choclo is a type of Peruvian corn that has very large, dense kernels with an almost potato-like consistency. It has been compared to hominy but I think the flavor and texture of choclo is much better. We have trouble finding it in LA, so we brought this big bag of frozen choclo home from Newark. If you don’t have choclo, use regular corn.
We’ve already begun the sorting out of our stuff- what fits, what we use, what is better done with something else. We’re already ahead of the game, and continuing to increase that head start DESPITE our illnesses and injuries.
I don't know where it went wrong... scratch that... I don't know what's right about it. The colors are not right, the frame layers didn't really line up, the distressing on the frame faded as it dried... Not my favorite card I've ever made.
Is one worth more than another?
It's releasing tons of methane gas into the Arctic air.
Kintyre lighthouse was my aim,
In case any of you missed the memo, HSUS is NOT a governmental authority on anything; they have no police powers. Their "agents" are nothing more than individuals playing dress-up; much like we all did as kids. Except when HSUS agents play cops and robbers, the result is dead animals and individuals deprived of their due process rights!
Now if you kids are like mine and you tried the usual pleading, or threats to get them to eat their dinner and that hasn't worked I have the perfect Bribe, er um reward. I am totally not above bribing, um rewarding my kiddos to get them to do what I ask. Everyone loves a reward right?
OK, so we all can’t head to a tropical resort this time of year. The next best thing? Revel in the cold weather, which the folks in two adjacent Delaware River towns have been doing every January for years now. Activities at the Lambertville – New Hope Winter Festival, which runs from January 27th through the 31st, span both sides of the bridge between New Jersey and Pennsylvania. Among the impressively long list of proceedings are a jazz concert, cabaret, and many other musical performances; a parade complete with Mummers; ice sculpting demos; and children’s activities.
In 60 years, from Task Force Smith to Special Forces, from desperation to revenge, and from protecting the little guy against an invader to smoothing the ground for business, armed forces have lost any shred of integrity.
128. According to a China’s magazine review, Dio had a lot antifans in China, because of the spread of issues from his trainee days.
Shaking his head in annoyance he flung his arm around and said 'Could you turn the light on please'. Good to hear the good manners even in a state of sleep.
We've lived in our new apartment for about five weeks.
Standing on the dark headland,
-continued*
And heres the video,all produced in one day,yesterday(that included hitting Vinny De Paul's in Sean McDermott street for a pair of curtains to make the Blue screen)with a borrowed lappy,a webcam and a budget of €2.I must say I am happy with the end result.
The above travel assistance is a contribution towards expenses incurred by the appointee and his/her dependants in re-locating to Singapore. Such expenses refer to costs for travel, packing, transportation and insurance of personal and professional effects as well as settling-in expenses.
That I do, but, but
I went back to my bed room.
I'm telling you. Gravy is easy to make. Who needs packets? Really? That canned stuff? The ingredients scare me. C'mon, you can do it! If you do, and it works, I'd love to hear from you.
The link gadget will close on August 9th at 11.59pm CST.
The event began with Diamante. "It's especially exciting for me as a fifth-generation Brooklynite," declared the announcer, who actually was raised outside Washington, DC. "It's going to be the best sports and entertainment venue in the world."
SUCKceeded, indeed!
the armour of God.
The legal issue is clear. Do we abide by international law, the European Convention on Human Rights, our own domestic human rights laws or not? The moral issue, which causes the greatest difficulty for many is…should we when those who would do us harm disregard it? Reading comments from members of the public on Times coverage of the issue reveals many who regard Shami Chakrabarti, Lord Bingham, the Supreme Court, the Court of Appeal and a host of human rights lawyers as a thorn in the side of ‘good governance’ and some even go so far as to suggest that our courts are pro-Taleban and lackeys of the left-wing.
3. Why do you prefer being with new people? Is it because we remind you of your past? (Yes, sometimes. New people don’t base every move I make on my past)
Really, all religion is, is raging narcissism coupled with bad self-esteem.
Israeli settlements have been contextualized through Israeli legal and political references, as opposed to references commonly accepted in international law. The emphasis on differences between Israeli governments, political parties and religious/ultra-nationalist settlement movements is distracting and misleading; colonizing the rest of historic Palestine has been and remains a national Israeli project.
Ah, but give me a journal and pen and plop me down in a funky little coffee shop, and I can spend many happy hours immersed in the creative ocean. It is quite satisfying and seems to activate certain bodily energies that want to express on paper. It is a wonderful antidote for moods and opens up the energetic field that allows Love’s vibration to flow unimpeded.
For a CD, I like the song selection here more than the recent 2010 Greatest Hits. Even though that one has more songs, it omits the essential Roadrunner, and Little Liar, which was a hit, and should be on any Jett hits package. This one from '97 is available cheap, even new.
DH: Yes.
Combine the dry ingredients. Whisk the eggs with the egg yolk, then add the buttermilk, oil, and vanilla and whisk until combined. Add the wet ingredients to the dry ingredients mixing just until combined.
Block 5 done! It's like a sickness. An obsession. I just can't stop. I said I was going to take a break from making Swoon blocks. And I did. For less than 24 hours. I got my Postage Stamp top done and then I picked block 5 right up and started in.
So long to afternoon naps spent with my book (Curtis Sittenfeld's American Wife - excellent) and a mug of tea.
Baking Powder- 1 1/4 tsp
Up until this moment, the school of those on the side of a natural phenomenon was not lacking valid arguments. This discovery considerably weakens their position and leads to a series of discoveries which confirms the artificial, “intelligent” character of the phenomenon.
Aerosoles wedges (not really seen due to aforementioned wideness of trouser legs)
The iWeek website reported that VASTech had also sold its technology to the South African government in 2005 under a three-year contract for a "recording solution". Barnard also refused to elaborate on this contract.
too. I am not even a tiny bit of the Germ Phobe that
His reluctance to debate publicly is also worrying for a man who edits the country's largest, albeit very mediocre, English language Sunday paper. You would think someone in that position would leap at the opportunity to put one of his errant former columnists in his place wouldn't you? After all, here is the golden opportunity to prove that everything he has said in the past about me is true. But he doesn't even answer the e.mails I send him at the Sunday Times or respond to reminders from Times editor Ray Hartley that I send regularly on Twitter. To me his refusal tells me all I need to know. You must draw your own conclusions.
after my morning walkies, of course!
MacNeice’s poems from the late thirties fall into the latter category. “Autumn Journal”, written during the “Phony War” in late 1939, is probably the best exemplar of these twilight-of-peace poems.
She stares at him, blank incomprehension and there, beneath the little-girl-lost act a flash of anger. Her lips are still pressed tight but she’s no longer smiling, her hands behind her as she glowers, sneering out the words. “You can’t change your mind.”
At some point in time old folks don't want to be "messed with" any longer. Despite our medical advances our own physical evolution has not kept up.
I will never forget when a friend said bye and I corrected her saying, "No, farewell forever is more appropriate"; I don't think I can ever forget the way she looked at me while replying, "Oh, Jacopo...".
103. Lay likes to play basketball. And according to him the shameful thing from playing basketball is acting cool.
Winner and getting a brewday with Sambrooks Brewery Fergus McIver with Taste the Darkness. This was a great american style stout, probably entered in the wrong category or would have been higher up on the judges lists.
2-4pm: Sunday acoustic lunchtime jam with The Poetry Chicks, Maria Doyle Kennedy, Clara Rose, Mundy, Lily Allen, Shane McG – and whoever else is nice enough to get down with the “ordinary” people for a parlor sing-song in exchange for a slice of home-made tart and lots, and lots, and lots and lots of love.
The ropes gradually raised mid-piece, taking a dancer with them, as a female soloist danced downstage left. The captured male escaped, only to haunt the female from directly behind the rope barrier; his undecipherable whispers continued after the woman left the stage, painting a picture of mental instability. More solos and group work in this section built upon previous animal imagery and established a sense of community amongst the dancers.
Radio stations that use such terms are the 24 hour cheap beer pubs of the airwaves. Surely censorship cannot be applied here? There will be a demographic that likes the crass or in your face at times, if every thing (including speech – remember free speech and those who don’t want to hear expletives can boycott the channel, only a dictatorship would write laws or penalise for free speech . . . ) is gentrified including use of ‘harsh language’ what will happen to America’s democratic tradition? This is free speech being stopped here! If they want to offend some listeners, those listeners will just change channels and be matured enough to accept their ‘practices’ much like Burkha wearers (where France totally fail . . . did France lose that sense of Liberty which the Statue of Liberty represents? Giving (America) a symbol of Liberty does not mean liberty ends back home (in France) . . . ). Try the below clip on youtube, writing laws against for saying ‘crack ho’ is insane for generally irreverent tongue in cheek radio programmes unless USA is now Soviet Cold War Russia :
Murder in the Stacks – by Marion Boyd. Difficult to find, but worth the effort.
Be excited for who God has designed, created & called you to be.
And what a cool texture lace would provide to a needle felted design on a small candle mat. Hmmm...guess I'd better get busy!
So many times our ego gets in the way of our happiness. Why do we have a need to be right? Many times a shift in perception about needing to be right will help us maintain peace and happiness. Next time you are in a conflict of will or an argument ask yourself, is it really worth it? Hardly, if you are losing your peace to maintain your ego you will be disappointed afterwards because the ego can only temporarily be fulfilled before its starts searching for something else to bring it gratification.
However, I am not falling for it. I'd planned to go back during the school day tomorrow. I was the perfect nurse. I will not feel bad about the care I gave or for leaving when she was pushing us out the door. She complained that I left too easily. I will complain that the plays games too easily. It wasn't the first time she put words in my mouth.
Happy Friday all! Hope you are having a fabulous week and that our bit of Spring-spiration last week got you looking forward to warm weather! The entries in last week's challenge were delightful! Thank you to all that participated, we enjoyed visiting all of your blogs and viewing your entries! This week's Top 3 are:
Michael: Brad its not just Lawrence v. Texas, Perry is reinstating 10450 and there is talk about having all Americans sign something called a LoyalTea Pledge to prove their patriotism.
I started blogging almost a year ago because I thought I was going to die and wanted to get my thoughts down.
Utenzi
I was homeschooled up until tenth grade, and my social life revolved around church. I grew up submersed in evangelical youth culture: reading Brio magazine, doing devotions in my Youth Walk Bible, eagerly awaiting the next installment of the Left Behind series, and developing a taste in music that ran the gamut from Christian rap to Christian pop to Christian rock.
But I have to go root for the hometeam. Well, almost hometeam. My state doesn't have any major professional teams so Boston is as good as it gets. I guess I should start looking at the teams here now, but I have never taking a liking to them. Especially the basketball team, they deserve to stink.
I haven't much else to share as I am busy packing to go away on a retreat in Melbourne this weekend! I can't wait. SO many talented , beautiful scrappy friends in one place has only got to mean lots of fun, inspiration and laughing (not to mention chatting, eating and talking!)
But for now? For now things might be quiet around her.
Looking ahead, Carl Crawford has started playing extended spring training games and will likely be back in a little over a week. I would end up switching he and Berkman from DL to active spots, but I’ve got to start looking ahead to who I might drop. Right now it’s no one, so I’ll have to swing a deal or wait for someone else to get a boo boo.
Previous Posts in the Wedding...MN Style Series:
- The election takes place on the 2nd day of the AGM starting at 9 am.
17 How Soon Is Now
This mountain shall be removed.
He has plundered our seas, ravaged our Coasts, burnt our towns, and destroyed the lives of our people.
I came across this website about a week ago - The SoleMates, and also thanks to one of my very loyal blog readers, Abby, for letting me know about this company as well. This product might actually solve all the problems that most of my brides have when having their ceremony on a lawn.
Calories: 83 Fat Cal: 0
I have been watering my plants and herbs everyday – just need to keep this up. : )
I found this caaute pink Pottery Barn Kids washer and dryer for $14.99.
“And the silver spoon Obama got — I mean that generation, it can’t be denied, you can’t support affirmative action and then pretend it doesn’t exist. You don’t transfer from Occidental, which by his own accounts in his autobiography he mostly spent smoking pot, to a fine Ivy League university like Columbia if you’re not checking off ‘black’ on your application. So you know, the silver spoon since I’ve been alive has been an affirmative action silver spoon.”
I had recently bought my first home and moved in. I'd wiped out my savings and was on a tight budget. I desperately wanted a souvenir of this trip and I really wanted a painting. The artists' market in Monmartre had beautiful scenes of Paris - starting at about 250 Euro. I resigned myself to not buying art.
Treats brain injuries.
So now that I am racking up millions of dollars of dental bills, I need to find ways to quench my decorating thirst without spending too much money. Yesterday I got $30 bucks worth of velvet slimline hangers at Marshall's and turned my closet from this -
Min 2: “It’s Sunday, people don’t read very many blogs on Sunday, that’s a low-views day according to my stats.”
Father your word is true your precepts are binding your promises can not be broken. Father I pray today that what ever comes our way that the spirit of God that raised Jesus from the dead that lives inside of us as believers would rise up inside and come out in our speech and our attitudes and power that we would take authority over whatever is trying to defeat us. Lord you are greater and mightier than all of our enemies help us to stand in these promises in Jesus name.
“Ronan said that Mara thanked Eventide for her sacrifice to bring Cairn back?”
What do you think are the causes of the wave of crime in this country?
*Look away from the dog, but not WAY away. Head up, turned SLIGHTLY away from Fido, and keep him in your pereferal vision. The dog must be able to see your face to read it.
So, today we’re back with more; this time looking at the judges. Had a good crop of judges last year, but a dragoon of new judges is surely in the offing. Here’s who I’d like to see, using last year's mix as a guide.
There's a new online intellectual property journal, the Journal of Public Interest IP, which has just been launched by Public Interest Intellectual Property Advisors (PIIPA). Its website is here and Volume 1, number 1 is subtitled "IP and Development - Current Trends and Future Scenarios". The IPKat, who has watched with curiosity and not without a certain admiration the work done through PIIPA, wishes this venture well. Merpel can't understand why, in these days of instant online delivery, electronic journals still come out in volumes and issues rather than just posting their material online when it's ready for people to read.
I can sense that some of my contemporaries are uncomfortable with this little experiment and project on to me that it’s an exercise in righteous self-denial and even self-punishment. Far from it. As anyone who has experienced fasting or conscious simplicity knows, there can be an increase in connection, joy and freedom.
Recognized for having updated the language of trunk-makers with creativity and meticulous attention to detail, Pinel & Pinel have created a setting where cognac is the star. True to the love of fine craftsmanship while adopting the innovations of the day, they have designed a mobile trunk-case which is the largest ever produced: an impressive 2,06 meters high, 2,20 meters wide and 0.70 meters deep. It captures both the essence of Martell and the philosophy of the art of cognac, skill, quality and patience.
You don’t even need to read this post. I’m just rambling in the small moments before I have to go to work.
Sweet went on to record a final album for Columbia, which we'll get to at some point. These days, she's behind the scenes, working as a producer for television shows like "The George Lopez Show". But just imagine if "Idol" was around in 1981...
5 whole eggs plus 3 egg whites
Essentially, what I’ve learned is that the best friendships are organic. While effort is put into maintaining the relationship, it also feels effortless because you are compatible. My greatest hope for you, readers, is that you have and/or find a friend like mine who you can share life with.
Personally, I'm one of those wary types who are naturally predisposed to approach the twin concepts of hype and coolness with extreme caution - perhaps even with a trace of scepticism, but I've learned over time that amid the throng of charlatans, pretenders and wannabes, there can be found certain brands which are considered cool and are being hyped because they actually happen to merit it.
You recorded your first album in 20 hours – what are your memories of that recording session…
The house siding project continues. While Josh & his brother worked on the siding, my nephews played our Wii. Elliott wanted to play along, and definitely got some important Mario tips he's filed away for later.
Simply put, why innovate and do something new, when the tried, true and old is selling anyway?
I read the other day, evoking many memories, that the great publisher Barney Rosset had died aged 89, and reflected on what adventures and enterprises those years had yielded. With his admirable Grove Press, he brought out, among other daring coups, Lady Chatterley’s Lover, Tropic of Cancer, Waiting for Godot, Story of O, and, on film, I Am Curious (Yellow), which entailed many law suits and other battles with puritanical censors and craven exhibitors, all of which and more Rosset triumphantly won. He achieved free speech for literature and cinema in America for all time to come.
Time for he final circle seam! Align the pieces as before, with the 7" center piece on point and right-side-up on the table, and the 6" background hole right-side-up on top of that. Flip the outer edges and pin, pin, pin.
Each Monday, Grammar Monkeys will offer grammar tips in a podcast. The first post is about “lay” versus “lie.” Give it a listen.
After weeks of travel, I had pushed my flight plans to the back of my mind, but I woke up anxious the morning of my return flight. Thank goodnes I can not see into the future, otherwise I would never have gotten out of bed the morning of June 10th. The good news: there was an actual plane, and I was going to take an actual USAirways flight.
So here’s the thing, if you’ve read one of my books and maybe haven’t reviewed it online or, even if you have, unless you’re one of the seven mentioned above who are exempt, maybe you might think about rattling down a few lines and adding an appropriate star rating which does not have to be a 5—honestly. (Much as I can’t stand them I know they’re a necessary evil.) Or perhaps you might want to do a Listmania® list and include one or two of my books. Or do a review on Goodreads if you happen to be a member, or anywhere else you can think to spread the word. I hate to ask—no, seriously, I really hate to ask—but this seems to be the way: don’t ask, don’t get.
Kamelion was one of the more unfortunate ideas of the series, in that the production team were unable to operate him after the death of his creator. In this story they resort to turning him into a silver humanoid bloke, which is less than convincing. Kamelion's death does not inspire much feeling from the viewer because we have seen so little of him.
What should it be? We are far enough out that we do not qualify for the classic suburban mantle. Exurban doesn't seem to fit.
A pull down changing board in toilet
But please don’t interfere with how I go about it!
All praise to God, the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ. It is by his great mercy that we have been born again, because God raised Jesus Christ from the dead. Now we live with great expectation, and we have a priceless inheritance—an inheritance that is kept in heaven for you, pure and undefiled, beyond the reach of change and decay. And through your faith, God is protecting you by his power until you receive this salvation, which is ready to be revealed on the last day for all to see.So be truly glad.There is wonderful joy ahead, even though you have to endure many trials for a little while.
Y. Yummy food that you make: Jarrod likes when I make chicken pot pie, so there is that. But, honestly, the desserts are the yummiest food I make. :)
what a gift had been given by the Seamstress:
don’t be predictable, confusion buys time
Being proud of myself.
9/7 Atlanta, GA- Chastain Park Amphitheater
It’s been over twenty-five years since I last saw Louie, and the luncheonette once known as Izzy and Benny's is long gone too. Now some kind of nameless cell phone store on McDonald Avenue.
Be of service. Find volunteer work in an area that interests you in order to practice bringing love to every situation.
Although 1Q84 is set in a time when most people went about their lives without knowing that computers existed, the novel clearly reflects the concerns of the digital age. Like George Orwell’s 1984, 1Q84 handles issues of identity formation and information control in a world that is unstable and confusing under its placid surface. Cult leaders, lines of power, rapidly shifting worldviews, and the creation and co-existence of multiple histories all factor into the novel, which ultimately questions what sort of agency an individual can have in an environment silently controlled by invisible systems. The subjective viewpoints of Aomame, Tengo, and Ushikawa allow the reader to approach this problem from different angles, and Murakami himself never seems to align his novel with any one political or philosophical perspective. Like Orwell, Murakami also exploits the dark humor implicit in any dystopian situation. For example, the NHK fee collector, who might be seen as a direct allegorical representative of Japanese postwar social control, is just as comic as he is frightening. When he positions himself outside of a victim’s door and starts ranting, his diatribes are gleefully malicious:
I: Instruments that you can play: flute, piano, oboe, and piccalo
11:30 am: When asked to help straighten up, a comment informing me she was “TheBomb-Dot-Com” was hurled at me. (The ensuing state of shock prevents me from recollecting the exact remark).
- selecting "Mention" from the tool icon in their profile
you? From financial ruin? From a collapsed career? From a fractured marriage? From
Why does a woman make the conscious decision to stay with a man who has such little regard for her, such little respect? Not only that, but I find that many women actually justify his actions or pretend they didn't happen. They convince themselves that he is faithful, that he loves them, that it won't happen again.
And when a beautiful baby girl was born this past summer with KT's eyes and Kiwi's face, it seemed pretty darn perfect up there in the mountains. Until the ground slid and the earth started moving in ways they never expected. You know when you have a baby and you worry about every thing that COULD go wrong and everyone tells you it never happens? Well, the cold, hard truth is...it does happen to some babies. Some mamas have their fears confirmed. And while the situation may be something you can manage? It's still scary as hell and it never feels fair.
Moments ago, I witnessed some of this cleaning-related insanity. My father was sitting on the floor, wearing a tall Dr. Seuss-style hat from Halloween 2004, and rummaging through the several boxes and bags of old trinkets that my sister and I had just determined to give away. He pulled out a stuffed frog and a pack of colored pencils with excitement. “Look at this!” he said. “Cool, ya? I bet this is a collectors item!” He proceeded to get out more boxes so that he could organize the donations. He held each box up and gave it a name before filling it with the proper contents: “Jewelry. Sheets and table cloths. Shoes. Toys. Electronics.” When he was finished, he proudly stated, “I made the junk more orderly.”
Which reminds me.
I don’t really know that much about Shuppet otherwise; I’ve never owned one nor encountered one in the wild…
Obesity, on top of being unhealthy for the body, directly affects brain functions. Some researchers have even questionned the role of obesity in brain degeneration.
The Bitch is Back
Finding out how Considerably to invest
shadow passing over
Still, I think I can make it work, one way or the other. I'd appreciate your thoughts, though; how do you look at the 'YA' label, as against a straight-up 'fantasy' billing?
Phone: 800.368.5441
Are you still wondering why America and its economy are in decline? Then you must read Selling Out a Superpower: Where the US Economy Went Wrong and How We Can Turn It Around by Ronald R. Pollina ($26.00, Prometheus Books). Economics may make your eyes glaze over or even just sound boring, but this extraordinary book by a man who has worked for decades with companies seeking to relocate or find a State congenial to their growth will prove to be a shocking explanation of what is wrong with the economy. I guarantee you that it is not boring. For example, I bet you do not know that in 1968 there were 62 lobbyists in Washington, D.C., and that today there are 34,000! They outnumber member of Congress and their staffs by a margin of two to one. By 2008 they were spending approximately $8.2 million for influence every day. Few represent the majority of Americans in the middle class. And that is why the real median household income in America has stagnated for more than a decade. The farther the nation has drifted from the constraints of the Constitution, the greater the central government has grown, strangling the economy with massive regulation, rising levels of taxation, and literally driving companies and the jobs they provide offshore. No single book I have read this year comes close to explaining what has occurred and what must be done to avoid a bad, sad future for the next generation of Americans.
We have an energy addiction. To me, I see us wasting the most energy in our homes. We all need energy; it is the foundation of everything we do. We need it for transportation, cooking, manufacturing, lighting, and especially for entertainment. We must use our energy resources wisely and there are many things we can do. In our homes, we can focus on turning off our appliances or buying energy efficient ones.
Let’s just look at a few of the major Islamic indicators:
If you want to stay around the North West when you graduate (and I know a lot of our postgrads do), it’s easy enough to find companies with a presence here – just look in the phone book.
22 door
It’s proving to be a really great transition period for me. Getting used to homework and managing my own time without traditional office hours has been a challenge (Homework or nap? Nap or homework?) But I’m glad I’m having a chance to get back into the swing of things now before the semester starts. Another perk has been the assigned reading of the books we’ll be using in the fall. Having lesson plans and readings as a priority now will inevitably make fall term much easier. And though I’m still nervous about teaching, I at least feel like I’ll have the right support, particularly all the current TA’s we’ve been meeting with and learning from.
The guy who led the first audition appeared out of a side door and sat down on a stone wall to have an informal chat with me. No stilt audition would be necessary, since I would be undergoing a training period with their stilt trainer. Besides, the stilts we would be using were not the kind of stilts I had brought. Instead, we would be working on the much safer and easier to use platform type of stilts. All of this made sense, so I did not question the informal chat of a call back.
Toodles Noodles,
In 1961, he helmed the adaptation of Truman Capote's Breakfast at Tiffany's starring Audrey Hepburn. The following year, he made two films that no one could accuse of being slapstick: Experiment in Terror with Glenn Ford and Days of Wine and Roses with Jack Lemmon and Lee Remick battling alcoholism.
This is a series of engines that was designed by a company called Enterbrain. These engines are the ones commonly referred to as RPGMakers, or RM for short. There are many RM engines in this series, some of which are new and some outdated.
I’m ok today.
As well, “climate change is speeding, but many people are still in ignorance of this.” Unfortunately, he is right on target on this one, too.
all her idea.
After about an hour the bleeding slowed down. My birth team got me all set up in my bed and Brenda brought in her scales to weigh Lou. Lou tipped the scales and we laughed about that. My birth team made sure there was plenty to drink and fresh fruit by my bed.
The Guardian reports today that The Metropolitan Police are lobbying the A-G for wider powers to “arrest protesters for causing offence through the words they chant and the slogans on their placards and even headbands.”
But, in this case, as with the proposals for bureaucratic control over “High Pay”, or the Tories mangled proposals over Child Benefit it is not the truly rich who are being targeted, it is not the Capitalists who make millions of pounds from their Capital alone, each year, but the Middle Class, and the purpose of that is to cover the real attack, which is on the workers below them, who will lose out proportionately more, once again. Hutton himself had to admit that the average Public Sector Pension was modest, but that didn't stop him arguing for cutting it! It didn't stop him arguing that the one piece of certainty that Public Sector workers have – that they have some idea what their pension will be when they finish work – should be removed with the scrapping of Final Salary Schemes.
2. i am more comfortable teaching than doing
India’s banks have begun sending out warning signals that a credit crisis worse than the one in 2008 could be just around the corner, according to analysts, bankers and credit rating agencies.
He believes the move is a vital part of addressing a crisis in responsible parenting by fathers and increasing the rights of men in family law.
And, that was my first day in Firenze. I walked.
The central government has been trying to take over two provincial education systems that are effectively bankrupt.
--I offer to accompany friends of mine--specifically women, people of color, and queer people--to wherever they're walking to, even if it's just a block. I feel incredibly grateful and supported when others do this for me, and very alone when others don't.
But after about Day Three, I start going through carb-withdrawl. I think part of this has to do with the integral role bread plays in my diet. When I was little, my most distinct food memories involves flour and sugar. One Passover when I was about eight, I started crying because I couldn’t make it 48 hours without bread. This ended with my mother making me a large, skillet-sized M&M pancake, doused in Maple Syrup.
can be colorful and delicious without
As for the tea itself, this is a version of one of the finest types of Oolongs: Tie Guan Yin from Taiwan. The vendor says it’s 40% oxidized and 45% roasted. The dry leaves are in tight crunched up balls and have an aroma like watermelon rind and hints of cocoa. We heated some water to the recommended 190° F and prepped for steeping.
1,007,000: Construction Jobs Lost Since Obama Took Office. (Bureau of Labor Statistics, Accessed 4/10/12)
You have also started copying Momma when she does certain things – you like to repeat sounds, hand movements, and you cough when I cough (and then laugh about it). You also help Momma with daily chores like folding laundry and dusting. I hope that continues as you get older!!
No other super-book has ever caught the sense of perpetual crisis matched with the almost-psychedelic intensity of experience which characterises so much of mid-teen life. Lee and Ditko's crowded, swift-paced storytelling captures a world of almost-constant bafflement and crisis matched with occasional, and often illusionary, moments of extraordinary achievement. Those who've characterised the early Spider-Man as nothing but a costumed soap opera have confused its creator's methods with their achievement. Yes, Lee and Ditko presented their readers with a tragi-comic melodrama replete with quite-literally faint-hearted guardians and doomed-to-lose love affairs, but those plot-beats were used to create the most convincing of all superheroic depictions of two-steps-from-adulthood life. We care for this version of Peter Parker not just because he's a decent-hearted and lovable loser, but because his adolescent experiences evoke, in their own ridiculously exaggerated way, our own. His is a superhero story that's genuinely concerned with everyday life rather than the perpetuation of any mined-out, life-sidestepping fantasies.
Suicune is the 3rd of the legendary beasts (in Pokedex order), unlike Raikou or Entei, it doesn’t roam. It’s the mascot Pokemon of Pokemon Crystal, appearing on the box. One of the characters, Eusine, is obsessed with Suicune; he’s been chasing after it for a long time. So I wonder if he’s jealous that you end up catching it, haha.
used to drink coffee more than once in a while);
Favorite bridal shoe?
Alright, I think I’ve come to a conclusion..
Izzy’s mom put on her polite smile and zipped up her purse. “I’m afraid we haven’t had the pleasure of meeting Mrs. Malloy yet.”
always there
It sure looks like hexagons are all the rage. I remember seeing the latest products from the Winter CHA photos . So many companies have come up with products and supplies with Hexagons! Here are some eye candy that I found via Pinterest.
Love to all who are "LOST"™
No one else got pulled aside, not one. Not to make light of people who really are profiled and victimized and fondled, and searched, but I just got served. I got profiled!
Seems like several new ingredients are on the shelves this year...or again, maybe I haven't been very observant! I'm digging this bit of ease though! I hope they are as good - they are quite a bit smaller than I chop the candy bars when I do it by hand.
Alamos Red Blend 2010
Messages of bravado and machismo — such things have always been for Republicans exclusively! Most especially since the Vietnam War years, after which Democrats were portrayed as weak-kneed surrender monkeys, a lovely little piece of framing that the GOP successfully attached to the left for a generation. Every election we hear the same stories repeating that line, too: Democrats will get you killed. Democrats can’t be trusted to keep the nation safe. Only Republicans know how to do that. Only Republicans are muscular enough to have the support of the military. Only Republicans have a big enough dick. Look, here are the pictures to prove it.
0822h and i'm up, cleaned up and dressed...sure, no big deal for all ya'll..but try that on crutches...ain't fun or easy. hey, i'm excited about little things/accomplishments right about now! thanks for the emails of encouragement and comments here. between my friends and family here and then all ya'll out there...i am one damn lucky woman!
“Now, however, I am on my way to Jerusalem in the service of the saints there. For Macedonia and Achaia were pleased to make a contribution for the poor among the saints in Jerusalem. They were pleased to do it, and indeed they owe it to them. For if the Gentiles have shared in the Jews’ spiritual blessings, they owe it to the Jews to share with them their material blessings. So after I have completed this task and have made sure that they have received this fruit, I will go to Spain and visit you on the way. I know that when I come to you, I will come in the full measure of the blessing of Christ” (Romans 15:25-29).
Driving home a bit earlier, the starlit sky was stunningly beautiful, and the crescent moon, which was hanging as low as teenagers trousers, seemed to be smirking, cheekily. I decided that I would blip it. Can't find it. It's there somewhere, because it is still a beautiful starlit night, but I can't see the moon anywhere, it must be so low that it has dipped below a house or a hill. Is it a bleeding portent of something?
I’ve stopped trying so hard to build up my social links in the parenting community. More longtime friends are having children now, and the less I look for friendships the more they come around from out of the blue. I don’t need to subscribe to any newsletters, or join any clubs. My kids (and charm?) are the only parent bait I need.
Hamlet (Maurizio Millenotti)
Dad: "From all she had to say, I am proud of the way you are doing in school."
the ideal of flashmobs that are as cool as the one on glee (safety dance). i would be so thrilled to be somewhere and everyone around me started dancing and singing. can you imagine? if the idea intrigues you, check out youtube for the one around christmas that flashmobbed the hallelujah chorus. so very cool.
- Lovely Complex (i really love this anime! it’s jampacked with romance, comedy, drama, school life, and sometimes HORROR. LOL XD)
Thank you Tracy! Thank you blog reviewers and new friends! I can’t believe that I am two, yes two friends away from 300!!!! Another reason to be excited!!! Anyone want to send two more friends my way? ;-) They would be very welcome here!
Astrophysicist: "I am careful to only operate this highly technicalogical machinery when I am absolutely sober and have had a good night's sleep."
In ‘Kiss’, we also have our couple positioned in front of a closed window with open curtains. Brilliant, Munch. Thank you. This indicates to me the external world, the daily affairs that occupy so much of our time that could be better spent kissing. Kissing, the subjects are oblivious to that which is external. Sooner or later they may have to put clothes back on, and maybe she will have to make a sales pitch while he teaches nine year olds their times tables, but for now they have put the world on hold and each exists only for the another. They are escaping. In a dream, they could stay in their hostel room for an eternity, wrapped up in bodies, secure, complete. The kissing will inevitably end, but for this relatively infinitesimal time, it may as well go on forever. The world can wait. In this sense, the kiss is an allegory for every social transaction. Everything is transient, everything fades, but everything is worth experiencing nonetheless. No kiss goes on forever, nor does any ‘Chameleon’ jam, nor any relationship unchanged, but a kiss is, if not beautiful, unique, and can last forever in memory.
Another night I came home with a kitchen stocked with groceries that we needed desperately, but didn't have the time or money to get. He found a job to help someone move and made some money so we could actually eat something other than rice and potatoes. He was especially good about getting me my "healthy food" that he refuses to eat. Then with the extra money we went on a date with some of the guys on his team.
This hurt my feelings - Lynda Barry, on the cartoon "I Hate Lynda Barry"
“Do you have 3 tickets??” I asked. “Sure, I can help you” she said…”let me take you to my boss”.
I also know we can only meet people's desire for a better politics if we make promises we know we can keep. At this stage, I can't make a promise on tuition fees, but I am clear about our guiding principles."
it is usually to meet a need you have expressed.
3. A fleeting desire to get into Tribute-worthy shape. This, however, usually passes when you realize that your gym definitely does not stock its weight room with spears, bows, and climbing ropes and in no way are you going to limit your diet to rabbits and berries.
Can you think of anyone you know who always seems to sabotage relationships that are going well? This is de-compensation. If they are most familiar with a relationship that is angst ridden, and they find themselves in a supportive environment, they are going to try and get back to where they are comfortable. They are likely to generate drama, or end the relationship (or both).
I did a short stint of university level psychology. In an experiment to demonstrate the way people think, a situation was set up where a loud crash was heard in an adjoining room to where people were waiting. If the majority in that room didn’t react, then neither did the test subject. It works the other way around as well: if the majority suddenly got up and ran from the room, then the stranger who had no idea what’s going on ran also.
As I do most of Stephen King’s works, I enjoyed it and it moved quickly despite its millenary page count. I really like how he populated a town and then forced them to remain together through the plot device. Very interesting dynamics. Now, some of his characters were larger than life and a little hard to believe, but that was acceptable. The only thing that persistently bothered me during my romp through this tome was the timing. The degeneration of the town took place not over months or even weeks but days. I guess I just have a little more faith in humanity than that. To me, the work would have been strengthened if the time frame had been expanded. There were also some silly little supernatural things which occurred that felt out of place (mostly involving a dog), and there was one very postmodern chapter that was really out of place. In it, a disembodied narrator appeared and flew through the town describing everything that was happening in a summary fashion. It was weird, came out of nowhere, and disappeared just as quickly. You have to wonder if it just got missed by an editor. All in all, though, I think this was one of his better books and his characteristic exploration of character and setting were on full display.
Huge green field
My ulnar and radial nerves were the primary suspect. My bulge was causing a lot of pressure, accompanied by inflammation in the muscles, surrounding the nerves in both my neck and shoulder. This was the reason the numbness would change locations from left to right arm and would be apparent in different parts of each hand. It explained why nearly every time I moved I was in pain.
As usual, can’t wait until next Saturday.
...and let the competition begin! Brighton set the microwave at High for 30 seconds, which is more than ample time. 15 - 20 seconds will do the job. But my boys like to watch the Peeps melt after they've proven themselves in competition.
You can view a printable recipe at the bottom of this page. Make this cake, I tell you! It'll quickly become a keepsake, if you love lemon.
I combed through prospectuses. Weighed up reports from the Good Schools Guide. As a family we spent a Sunday afternoon perched in a row on the sofa watching promotional DVDs from different schools. Bland. Largely uniform. But so telling in the minor details. One focussed mainly on the boys and the boys' sport, with scant female airtime or focus on parity of provision for the fairer sex. Another was packed full of young men wearing cityboy ties in their freetime, drawling confidently in upper class accents. Compulsory cadet corps. Is this what we want? Can't we just find a setting where Firstborn, we, might be acceptable as we are, with the beliefs, accent, class we have? Honeystoned buildings. Polished, practised orchestras in olde worlde chapels. Jangly jarring feelings on the sofa.
Your number this month - 29
Then comes Charleen. A longtime friend and former teacher of McElwee's, we first meet her playing a scratch-off lottery ticket in a Charleston, S.C., McDonald's, haranguing Ross about the state of his love life. "It is boring for you to be middle-aged and lonely," she tells him. She wants to set him up with a woman she knows named Dede who is a singer and a musician. Charleen also advises him on the best way to land a mate. "Now the only way to get you coupled…and it can be a permanent thing…is to find you a woman who thinks that you're God. It's gonna take a special kind of woman to think you're God," she advises. Charleen even visits some Civil War sites with McElwee, though she finds it boring and depressing. "You see how foolish it all is. You see what the Army comes to. The bunkers, the island, the burned-out house. Hell, it's all a tragedy. It's just a matter of how you get through it." Unlike McElwee's sister who views the camera as a plus to get women to talk to him, Charleen always advises him to put it down or turn it off. "Forget the fucking film," she tells him at one point. At another, she adds, "This is not art, this is life." Charleen even offers to send Ross to dental school if he'd give up this filmmaking thing. With a character as flamboyant and scene-stealing as Charleen, any woman she sets Ross up with is sure to be a letdown, but the scene where Dede sings "Just the Way You Are" to a group of very young, bored and dumbfounded students at an all-girls school does prove priceless and the payoff of the Ross-Dede date and Charleen's reaction turns out hysterical as well. After this encounter, McElwee wisely decides to get out of Charleston before Charleen can inflict any more damage, but you'll have to see the movie to find out what that means.
One layer is certainly a breeze for you all now and many of you even enjoying it. Maybe it will take over the world!
Some of the quotes from the film:
Even I am amazed at how much detail I can take in of what is happening to me.. Every kick, blow, cut and scrape, I feel. I can see the faces of the angry mob, the brotherhood of insane okada riders, who like moths drawn to a flame, have now drowned me in a sea of heads, sticks cudgels and petrol.
Do not go gentle into that good night.
Suddenly, she shifted from her complaints to showing us how hard she was working on NOT laughing.
Ocker dad: Yer too yang son, yer too yang.
As soon as we landed in Milwaukee we went straight to Beans and Barley, a natural market, deli and cafe with vegan options. I had the tempeh reuben and Tim had the portobello sandwich. Both were very tasty. The cafe is bright and open with lots of natural light, the service is friendly, and it seems to be a popular place. Another couple that was on our flight showed up there too. It's definitely a first stop for good, healthy food in Milwaukee.
You may be wondering what has all of a sudden spurred me into this lifestyle change. You may not but tough tits for you because you get to find out anyway.
The Death Bed Vigil
I will say though that everything is wrapped up very nicely. There are some really interesting things that happen in the story. Tons of magic, tons of faeries, and David gets a certain sword that really makes things interesting.
That is the response to atheists who equate Christian love with evil. They either do not understand or refuse to see that love does not involve hate; those ‘Christians’ who scheme against others and sin against them are antichrists, because they work against Christ. They are not Christians at all.
Perhaps you should look through songs from Coldplay or The Fray. I’m not sure of any songs in particular atm.Hope you find what your looking for
There are times when I really get stuck for men's cards - like many people they are not my first choice card to make. But this one was fairly quick and easy.
Ohhhh what teases me more? The George Perez cover or the buttocks of Hal Jordan? (The Perez cover for sure.)
And cause designing is close to my heart I'll seek for the perfect art and fashion books.
The 4x4 then sped down Izak de Villiers Street towards other police officers. Opperman said the officers had to dive for cover to avoid the speeding car.
Screenshots at 630am CDT 4/29/2012:
It's been a pleasure to see all your clever scenes and creativity, so thankyou for sharing with us.
Sinclair nodded. 'Yes. And the book, she's always shown with a book.'
*The ticket-taker who gets pregnant must quit because “in those days you were supposed to get out of the public eye before you began to show”;
The proposal: Nick proposed on the Brooklyn Bridge. We had gone to get dinner at one of our favorite places in Brooklyn Heights but strangely enough, the little restaurant was closed to cater a wedding. We ended up going to a new restaurant in the area and decided to walk back to our apartment in Manhattan. Half way over the Brooklyn Bridge, we stopped. I was staring at the NY skyline, when Nick said my name and the next thing I knew he was on his knee with a ring in his hand. I immediately thought of all of those horror stories of couples getting engaged on the Brooklyn Bridge and losing the ring, so I grabbed the ring and put it on my finger before I said yes. Then I accepted.
- Come in give a short presentation about your company to students
The other thing that needs to be mentioned is that if you are mad that the rich keep getting richer and are not accountable for their actions. Then you don't believe in The Constitution, The Takings Clause states, "Private property shall not be taken for a public use, without just compensation." The Constitution comes from Locke, who believed that the protection of private property is the reason we left The State of Nature.
Janette: I hadn't even thought about TMI. Yeah, that would definitely make me want to keep the anon thing going. So you like to keep it anon. Describe the moment you realize PA Rocks might be Aspen. Did a part of you want to keep it anon or were you more curious to find out if it was her?
The Harry Potter Studio Tour is not a theme park. It doesn’t have rides and it doesn’t have a fake village of snowy Hogsmeade (which is strange to see in such hot weather) complete with an admittedly impressive Hogwarts castle overlooking it. What is does have, which I believe makes it win out over The Wizarding World of Harry Potter, is the original sets, props and
By far, my favorite feature is the seamless Facebook integration. As part of the “Reading Life” feature, you earn awards for reading. For example, you earn an award for your first book open, your first book finished or reading 5 times during the morning commute. There is no monetary value for this, but it’s cute to see the awards piling up and seeing your progress towards other awards. The best part is that you can easily share these awards on Facebook. So if your friends didn’t think you were a total nerd before, they really will now. (I still think that this is really cool).
Today, four decades later, David’s greatest photographic enjoyment comes from serving couples before, during and after their weddings; capturing
When Jez arrives at River Cottage Sonia is on her own, but she’s a voice coach who works from home, her husband is away on business and her daughter is at University, so Sonia must has to keep Jez under wraps when clients visit and her family return home.
I'm talking about "game-changers" in the sense that it will alter the industries perception of the horror genre, possibly opening it up for re-examination or the dreaded CITW knock-offs. Some examples of "game-changers to me are - Scream (1996) which led to God knows how many ironic detached teen slashers... The Blair Witch Project (1999) which led to a lineage of "found-footage" movies each one more "real" than the last... Saw (2004) which helped the Torture Porn genre find mass market appeal.
Ms Hoey angered many in the Labour party before the mayoral election when she said she would be taking an advisory role with Tory candidate Boris Johnson if he won.
Mk's socks are still on the needles I am about to start the short row heel & then its clear sailing hope to have to have them done by the end of the month. In time to cast on his next pair. I have also been working on my only UFO that I have running around from last year. Its my Queen Anne's Lace.
Macrospace E7 and The Consciousness within the Psychic Domain of the Parabrahman Lila
7. Get your plates ready! - It's time to eat!
Along with the well-publicized rise in the price of hops and malt -- which is pretty much world-wide -- lower values of the dollar vs. the Euro and other currencies mean that beers from Europe, Asia, and yes, Canada, cost more than they did a year ago (wonder if that's affected the price of Blue Moon, which MolsonCoors is currently brewing in Canada?). If you want to buy a fine Belgian ale, a crisp Bavarian lager, or a big bottle of Unibroue, the price curve on your decision will be steeper. From Heineken to Salvator to Rochefort 8, import beers are bound to take a hit in sales, particularly with all the election year scare-talk about a U.S. recession (Congress and Bush are talking about a "stimulus package" before we've even seen any evidence of a recession -- not that either party is pandering or anything).
because while we were sleeping someone was right outside our windows taking what was ours. they were apparently only interested in cash. because they left jeffrey's ipod and my wallet and credit card...but they got all of the cash out of my wallet that was in my car in the diaper bag. which was actually alot because i had cashed some checks to us and our girls that were Christmas gifts. on a normal day the robber would have been sadly dissapointed.
Here we've got a great quartet of great players on another concept/design I like very much. It's possible all four guys here will end up in the Hall (not 100% sure on Helton but I'd vote for him) as Alomar's in, Chipper's a no-brainer and A-Rod probably gets in as long as something crazy doesn't happen. What I like about all that is that Chipper's still the best player on the card as far as I'm concerned--at this point I'd take him over any of the other guys any day, and wouldn't you know it, he's clearly got the best relic piece on the card, a gorgeous Braves red (scarlet? I dunno, I just do primary colors...) swatch with stitching at the bottom. A sweet card in which Chipper is in good company.
informed ATF of the names of the two cartel contacts for whom he had been working, agents quickly came to learn that these two U.S.-based cartel contacts were already known to the Department of Justice … In exchange for one associate’s guilty plea to a minor charge of “Alien in Possession of a Firearm,” both of these cartel associates became FBI informants and were considered essentially unindictable well before Operation Fast and Furious concluded. One ATF official would later say that the discovery that the primary targets of their investigation were not indictable was a “major disappointment.” Adding to the information-sharing failure, DEA had actually provided Celis-Acosta’s cartel connection to ATF in December 2009 in an effort to ensure that ATF’s efforts in Operation Fast and Furious were not duplicative.”
The Pookie, who is a total mama's boy, has really been missing me. I knew that he was fussy at home with Londo. And in the mornings when I would see him, he was totally clingy to me, not even eating breakfast unless he was in my lap. But I talked to two of his teachers (one yesterday afternoon when I picked him up and the other this morning when I dropped him off), and they both immediately said that he'd been really clingy at school. They wanted to make sure everything was okay. When I explained that I hadn't been able to be around much because of work, they both said that made sense and explained why he was so clingy. I assured them that the busy period was over and told them about how we spent all weekend together*. They both said that he'd been a lot better yesterday and that explained that also.
There is something paradoxical and slightly disingenuous about publishing a collection of interviews. Whether the exchange is, in the first instance, oral or written, the intimacy and immediacy of the dialogue along with the specific circumstances which sparked the encounter must inevitably give way to an editorial process aimed at producing a publishable text of interest to a wider audience. Where the primary interlocutor is heavily involved in this process there is the increased danger that the rough edges of a dialogue, in which he or she is called to account for the aporias, discrepancies or contradictions in his or her work, will be smoothed down until nothing remains but empty repetition of existing themes and concepts. This is sadly the case in Conversations, a collection of recent interviews between Luce Irigaray and a number of scholars engaging directly with her writing and thought, including Judith Still and Elizabeth Grosz as well as those such as Michael Stone, Andrea Wheeler, Margaret R. Miles and Laine M. Harrington who are working in fields as diverse as architecture, yoga and theology. Despite the potential for a rich and exciting selection of discussions, Irigaray’s overwhelming desire to control her material, as well as all those with whom she enters into conversation, shuts down any genuine dialogue or interchange of ideas. The outcome is a largely stale reiteration of key aspects of her thought, most notably her insistence on ‘sexuate’ as opposed to ‘sexual’ difference and the notion of ‘breath’ as mediator between oneself and the other. Thus, while the collection will no doubt be of interest to those Irigaray completists eager to consume her every last utterance, those seeking a way in to her work may find it somewhat limiting and frustrating, as will those looking for greater clarification and development of certain aspects of her thought. Conversely, where Irigaray introduces her collection with an affirmation of the importance of open-dialogue and exchange between scholars yet fails to deliver a genuine openness during the conversations themselves, Cixous admits, in the prefacing interview to White Ink, her suspicion and discomfort with the spoken word, candidly expressing her preference for the written text and the complex play it allows her. Nevertheless, in the various oral interviews thoughtfully selected for the collection by Susan Sellers and which date from the late Seventies to the present, Cixous amply demonstrates her dexterity in verbal expression, not least in the breathtaking semantic acrobatics of her 2004 discussion with Jacques Derrida translated into English as ‘From the word to life.’ Although a wide variety of subjects are dealt with, including Cixous’s Jewish heritage and her childhood spent in Algeria, the collection’s subtitle; ‘Interviews on sex, text and politics’ is slightly misleading since what emerges first and foremost from these interviews is her passion for language, literature and theatre. This passion is brought to life with both enthusiasm and humility as Cixous refuses to focus solely on her own writing, often opting to discuss those writers who have most influenced her including, among others, Shakespeare, Joyce and Kafka. Although much of the insight proffered in these interviews is biographical rather than theoretical, the collection provides a useful backdrop to Cixous’s literary and theatrical works and would be of value to both newcomers to her writing and those already familiar with her texts. The translation of both sets of interviews into the English language demonstrates the widespread significance of both Irigaray and Cixous’s work for non-French speaking audiences. However, both acknowledge the inherent risk of decontextualisation and alienation which can result from a translation which fails to appreciate the intricate linguistic play at work in the original French. Consequently, Cixous’s interviews are frequently annotated with the original French in brackets in order to highlight such complexity. Irigaray, on the other hand, often translates her work herself as a means of maintaining its vitality. While these approaches are intended to assist the reader, the awkward syntax of Irigaray’s translations can lead to some confusion whereas the annotations explaining Cixous’s wordplay tend to attest to the primacy of the French language for her thought and the necessary exclusion of those unable to read it.
Keith James Burns, 39, East Rutherford, N.J.
At least they'll not have to put up with his unbalanced wibblings until October 2012, though, which is a welcome respite, I should expect.
“Cattle that are fed grass, not corn, produce meat that tastes the way it did 40 to 50 years ago,” says Tom Pellizzetti of Arrowhead Beef. “Not only is our beef healthier for you and more nutritious, it tastes better.”
I am a self-confessed creative department chauvinist. It seems to me that the creative people make the advertising and everyone else makes the arrangements.
possible big changes.
What about the ‘attack’ of Salman Rushdie on Islam and the Prophet? Did that inspire ‘defensive’ violence? It did inspire much ‘defensive’ violence and many killings. More to the point, many millions of ‘moderate’ Muslims have simply failed to criticise the ‘fatwa’ against Rushdie. Quite simply because it is acceptable to kill those who commit such crimes against Islam or the Prophet. And millions upon millions of others have also committed such grievous crimes against Islam and are doing so today. All of them deserve to die by a thousand fatwas.
The winners are foreign nations (like India and China) who can influence Canada's domestic affairs to suit their interests through their Canadian colonies Ottawa so stupidly imported, nurtured, and grew.
I also got a free scarf. The scarf is a very soft, light and filmy chiffon with a slight sheen to it which is not apparent in the photograph. The fabric is very sheer and semi-transparent so it would need to be wrapped over more than once (and possibly worn with an underscarf that includes neck coverage) if worn as a hijab but it is thin enough that I don’t think this would feel bulky).
and lakes great enough to be oceans
Each year, almost half of all pregnancies among American women are unintended. 1 About half of these unplanned pregnancies, 1.3 million each year, are ended by abortion. 1 , 2 Yet for a Christian woman, it may feel like she’s the only one dealing with this issue. Church leaders often don’t know how to approach the subject for fear of stirring “controversy.” Yet women need hope. They need to hear that others have faced the same pain and have found forgiveness and healing. That's why movies like October Baby are so important. The main character of October Baby is the young woman who survived the abortion attempt, and my heart also went out to her mother. No one knew the pain but her. I'm sure she was certain no one would understand.
This morning in a waiting room, I picked up one of my favourite magazines,Harper’s. Flipped it open to the first page of interest, though with Harper’s that is a challenge since every page grabs me. There was a piece about a man who wrote 1200 Novels, each of them only a few lines long and guess what… effective though his writing was, I cannot remember his name. My computer died, I am at the library and don’t want to use search time right now to find his name. What I will do is share a few of my fifty words or less stories and as soon as I am computer happy again, I’d like to expand on this concept because I have found short shorts and short stories the most difficult genre to write. Every letter must count. Poetry is like that, too, but I digress… Here are my few attempts at “story” in a few lines:
Alright, that's all I can think of. Wonder around your local sewing store and investigate. You'll find cool embellishments you can use and maybe some products you didn't know were available. (Grommets and hooks & eyes come on tapes!)
Saameira: Really? Err…what is it, Maisa?
L’Oreal Save $1/1 Excellence or Excellence to-Go shade (5/20)
Time to back down, Tanner decided.
35, Rue de Vaugirad
E: What is your most embarrassing moment in general?
To reach more people appropriately, in context, over time – than dishing out freebies to the Pinterati and patting ourselves on our massive corporate backs when they all spew predictably about their free gear, one might try:
Ok I think i should say a little about me. I am 20 years old, and I am in college. I'm doing a semester at some weird community college in Nowheresville, PA, but my heart is at St. John's University. I am a journalism student. This is because since I was a young child, I have been able to write my butt off. I am a nomad. In the last year I have lived in three states, my most recent being PA. Each place leaving a crumb trail WORTH telling about. I'm currently staying with my older sister Dawn, in attempts to keep me grounded.
But Varda argues that gleaning does not have to be strictly limited to foodstuffs. She interviews artists who create exhibits of art out of bits and pieces of trash that they have gathered from the garbage. She watches with curiosity as men smash abandoned television sets in order to collect the precious copper wiring. Varda goes even farther in her expanded definition of gleaning by exhibiting a series of souvenirs that she acquired in a recent trip to Japan. Notice how she doesn’t claim to have bought them. In fact, she “gleaned” them. This begs the question of whether or not the commercialization of world culture has led to its devaluation. After all, in the same department store where she got Japanese knick-knacks, she purchased small reprints of Rembrandt. If one doesn’t have to go to Europe to acquire a Rembrandt, is there anything distinctly European about it anymore? And if not, does it have any value beyond being a pretty thing to look at?
Wilson's. Take a look. Eh.
Brian Urlacher was selected in 2000 to help fill a void at the middle linebacker position. Not only did he fill it, he owned it. Becoming one of the leagues best MLB.
That night during the Salsa tanda at Club Gricel they played some Cha Cha Cha music. Usually the Salsa tandas consist of Cumbia and Merengue, it's pretty rare that they play a Cha Cha Cha. My regular Salsa partner Vivien is also a ballroom dancer and loves Cha Cha. I also enjoy dancing Cha Cha, but dance with more of a club style than ballroom. We were happy to dance to this enjoyable rhythm.
"There's a salad for you in the fridge," he says. "Let me know if you don't want it and I'll eat it tomorrow."
First of all, what is folic acid? It's simply a "B" Vitamin used in making new cells, and is a necessary component of, you know, staying alive. It's even more important to have the right amount if you're planning on getting pregnant. Starting at least a month before pregnancy, you should be taking in 400 micrograms of the stuff every day. The reward is helping to prevent birth defects of the baby's brain and spine, two components of a newborn you generally want to keep in tact... The easiest way to take in the right amount is a multivitamin or folic acid pill. Just check the label to make sure you're getting 100% of your daily value.
"It was hard for my ego to believe that the American public would want a tax cheat and dog hater to be their president. What is more American than loving a dog and paying your fair share of taxes? I know party ethics say I should support that loser Romney, but my ego says I shouldn't. Wake up America, Romney is just a lighter version of Obama." Newt said, as he choked back tears.
On the top of this, sprinkle the Rosemary, Salt, fresh ground Black Pepper and Red Pepper Flakes.
Oh, ’tis not in grief to harm me
Ask total strangers what they got you for your birthday. If they respond in any way, hop up and down while shouting, “Ahhhhh, I’m not supposed to talk to people!”
2010.09.02 Pakistan Kyber 1 0 Mujahideen kidnap and brutally murder a taxi driver returning from a friend's funeral.
He normally tells me when he's tired and wants to sleep, today he didn't.
Although it was clear she wasn't interested, the poor kid couldn't get her out of his mind. To his surprise this love he had read so much about was no fun at all! Actually it was torture! He tried to ease his heart by writing poems in the popular Petrarchan style. Reams of juvenile poems, the ink all splattered with tears, failed to bring him relief. What use was it to write her poems when she wouldn't even speak to him?! Unable to hide his misery, or his poetry, his heartless friends teased him mercilessly. The following Christmas, her presence at the holiday masques offered them rich opportunities for his humiliation. Loving her, hating her, hating them, he did his best to conquer his heart, to suffer in silence. If this was what love was all about, he wished never to experience it again!
After reading up on the movie and watching the wonderful trailers. I summarize the Dark Shadows in the following manner:
How does one define the ethereal quality of grace? We know what it is so well within our hearts, but it can be so difficult to describe. I think grace is reverence and thankfulness, and the elegance of the soul. It is living poetry that calmly smiles, and inspires with beauty beyond compare. Grace is that high divine quality that overcomes the human condition, granting respite amidst our endless difficulties. It elevates this rough and tough experience by waving the magic wand of love – the love that we share together at the core.
Below are 3 pairs of words. Find the words that fit in the middle of each pair of words to create two new words,
And, so now I'm thinking: So fucking what.
After Ana, Bill and Claudette, the twisting tail headed north, skirted Bermuda and aimed straight for the north Atlantic, round the Pentland Firth and down through the Moray Firth to blast Aberdeenshire.
California is rich in linguistic history. Thus native plants here have their official Linnaean names, their Spanish name and their multiple Native American names (many of which Harrington has preserved for us) (Yuccapedia). Sometimes, like their British counterparts, they have common names which may provide insight into their characteristics; and only our unfamiliarity with the classical languages in which their names are expressed, obscures the often prosaic meaning of the Linnean nomenclature.
Because everything has its place,
In anticipation of malaria cases, UNHCR’s health partners have started distributing insecticide-treated mosquito nets. Some 220,000 nets will be handed out in the next four weeks in Dadaab’s Ifo, Dagahaley and Hagadera camps, accompanied by demonstrations and information sessions on their use and care. The Dadaab refugee complex current hosts more than 460,000 refugees, the majority from Somalia.
Now, i’m back blogging!
1 cup (250 mL) semisweet chocolate chips
We have a number of wonderful prizes that have been donated by so many amazing friends...I was blown away by the response I got after sending out a mass email. Over $1,000 worth of prizes....THANK YOU to all who have donated- you all are the best.
But the system of contacting each font designer is time-consuming work for any publisher who wants to do the right thing. It might not be in the font designer’s interest either — anything that makes it hard to get paid is bad for business.
Two Beans or Not Two Beans?"
So that's what I've been up to this week. I like to decorate with a few favorite family ornaments, handmade crafts, and Mother Nature's gifts. Next week I plan to go into the woods and cut a tree and I'll share more pics with you then.
This entry was posted on Wednesday, November 16, 2011 at 9:17 AM. You can skip to the end and leave a response.
Bell Pepper, (optional), 1 pc, cut into bite size
Take the chappati dough and pinch a ball and roll into a small circle.
basmati rice
Bitch customer: So when are you gonna pop out some babies???
It is important to move toward the achievement of global democracy for the sake of both global policymaking and the overall legitimacy of world order. To move away from violent geopolitics, acknowledging changes in the status of governments by reliance on soft power criteria leadership of international institutions has never been more useful. From this perspective the selection of Dr. Kim, even if he lives up to his considerable potential for a turn toward global empathy, is one more lost opportunity to move beyond the West-centric structuring of world order after World War II.
None of those screencaps do the show justice, none at all.
I grew more and more ill with digestive issues and allergies over the years and hit my breaking point just as awareness about our unsafe food supply became rampant thanks to social media. Social media has become the wave and key motivating factor in the shift of demand from Frankenfoods to real, whole, nutritious organic food. And as I took hold of my illness and found that feeding myself a diet that is free of chemicals, preservatives, GMOs,as well as a healthy balance of clean foods, leads to a much cleaner slate when it comes to my health. Doctors visits are more sparse, digestive reactions are fewer and better controlled, I’ve lost and kept off 40 pounds.
Whilst news is constructed around a specific event and follows the criteria relating to the inverted pyramid of news writings who, what, where, when and why, the news feature is something more of a longitude, wider picture. It is the complete story on a recent topic and while it is written with similar urgency to a typical news story, it is based around the additional facts with provide the reader with more information. This post is looking at what to include and effective examples of news features to illustrate.
The ethics commission would also hear complaints against any city employee, council or board member to determine if that code was broken. No public official would be allowed to serve on the commission as the measure is written.
- minute steaks for steak sandwiches
I'll stop there. After running through this, I feel like a downright renegade with my BlackBerry! The only friend I can think of who has one is Texter. But the point is it would be kind of nice to date someone who shares some basic aspects of my lifestyle, including, perhaps, communicating via smartphone. Texting can be really convenient for coordinating plans or locating each other in a crowded restaurant, you know? So, I guess I'm looking for a polka-dotted texting unicorn. Sigh.
But perhaps in the coming months I shall return to this list, and remember what I was looking for, and read every one.
Being in top-level management for over 10 years, Greg Nowak understands how important it is to cut costs and manage office supply expenditure as effectively as you can. That is why Greg recommends Northland Wholesale for your wholesale office supply requirements.
I can tell you that you WILL find your answers from God and reading His Word, the Bible.
Last week I was incredibly blessed to be able to travel to Florida and spend time with people who I have only had the pleasure of getting to know on-line through a blog group. Even the two women that I “knew” I really didn’t know until this group came to be. It was a gathering of women who were specifically chosen by God, the time was ordained and anointed by the Holy Spirit. You may ask how I know that and I would tell you that this thing had the finger prints of God all over it and we felt the Holy Spirit, all of us did.
(of course, we never go anywhere
“Americas courtrooms must be open to keep the wheels of justice,” said ABA president Bill Robinson III.
I wanted to do some different flowers & was playing around with some old chipboard flowers and came up with these! I covered old chipboard with papers from the layout & the brown card stock. I then inked the edges, wrapped with contrasting floss & added some buttons as the flower centers! I think I may do a post in the next couple days showing a quick tutorial on how to do them ...they were fun & cheap!! I then added a couple brads to the shield for some added detail!
F: Sure, yeah, yeah. I’ve been expecting your call. My husband’s told me about you and I’ve set aside the time.
Godin: Big advances for midlist authors are the first to go. Second: all the hard-working people in the book production chain, because the lack of scarcity makes it hard to pay them to do the work they do. Mostly, though, I think it’s a fading of the power of a published book to influence the conversation. (My emphasis) When anyone can publish an ebook, anyone will.
But I must start with me, as selfish as that feels and sometimes sounds. I have to get rid of the thoughts that attack my mind and tell me that I'm no good, I'm too fat, I'm too ugly, I'm too much of this and not enough of that. Lately, that's all I've been thinking about. In reality, I know all of that is a lie. I know that I am good, I know that I have talents, my husband tells me that I'm pretty and he says he doesn't care about my extra lbs. I am a child of God. Nothing else should really matter in light of that.
You gotta dead soldier.
This is my first post with the new blogger/Google Chrome, I like this version, how about you guys?
Lets just debunk this myth, first off the figures are based on non science. The alcohol units were plucked out of the air and are utterly meaningless(see sidebar for more), also everyone has a different tolerance towards alcohol.
The other dominant theme of United 93 is the contrast of the ancient with the modern. Prayers are uttered throughout the film both by the terrorists and by the passengers while technology transmits final messages to loved ones. Airliners, which represent the conquest of man's technology over the vastness of geography, are used as a weapon of mass death. The terrorists use crude edged weapons to take over a complex piece of transportation and the passengers similarly use brute force in their revolt. One of the final images of United 93 is a frantic struggle by various pairs of hands for control of the wheel of the airplane. That juxtaposition of imagery suggests that 9/11 represented a clash of the ancient and the modern and the age that the attack ushered in would be defined by conflicts over whether ancient or modern hands would steer humanity into the future.
Is the Third Reich rising in Palmetto?
Saturday March 17 – Show Open – 10am to 8:30pm
From a region mark Southern Sulawesi, is specious from exaction further cow offal marinated agency acerbic carambola relish. De facto has a only sharp also enticing discrimination. Other glaringly satays, palpable is served off-course impudence.
"Because it's the Olympics we're not having Egyptian Day this year, we're having Greek Day instead."
Obama’s political idiom is one of a supposedly already post-racist America, that is, one of white America’s sin atonement vision, for cheap. Jesse Jackson,who was also mainstream but slightly edgy and not as colorblind as Obama could never have calmed the nerves of the liberal establishment like the way Mr.Cool has.
31. Name something you have to do tomorrow: Bootcamp!
Transitioning to something new means something must be wrong with the old. Some people try to fight change that’s why they wear shorts when it’s cold. Not trying to believe that change has come.
1 raspberry jelly
Connect Your Networks
DJ Food feat JG Thirlwell – Prey
That means that most of these went to work.
Here is his explanation of how he was watching out for his fourteen-year-old model/daughter:
Slow on the job front, more resumes to get out.
The weather has been very hot this week - unseasonally so, and not very conducive to knitting. It has been gorgeous, though, and yesterday I had such a lovely lazy day, sitting outside and making quite a little pile of crochet flower hairpins, all to go into shoeboxes, of course!
By the late 1890s it was already overcrowded, and in 1901 the City Council approached Andrew Carnegie about funding a new library, which he duly agreed to, helping fund the building that today is the Carnegie Centre (and still a branch of the City Library).
193 5. “Pornography and the Scope of the First Amendment.” Woman’s Law Reporter, The School of Law, Loyola University of Chicago, Summer 1985, pp. 1-3. (Source: Item D-III/28/1985, below.)
I want to start by thanking Todd and Norah for sharing their stories, for the work that they’re doing at the Murch School. It’s just, you know, a wonderful example of the partnership that can be created. This is our hope for all of you -- to just spread out around the country and replicate what they have done. And we are just thrilled with the level of broad thinking and creativity that they’ve put into this work. And we want to see more of it happen.
This returns us to the question at hand: can non-living things (which do exist) have consciousness? Empirical data seem to tell us no – however, if living things don’t necessarily have to be conscious, it seems that it’s not out of the question for non-living things to be conscious.
Guidelines are following,
As defined in The Bill of Rights and in the context of the time in which it was written, I do not believe the Second Amendment guarantees the public the right to the ownership or bearing of hand guns. How does a hand gun satisfy any of the purposes that the amendment was addressing? It doesn’t. Can you deter a tyrannical government or organize a militia outfitted with hand guns? No, that would be suicide. I DO believe the public has the right to bear rifles, assault weapons, shot guns and any equipment used by the military and government. This may be controversial but it is the true intent of the amendment. Let’s face it, assault weapons make big headline when used for murder but they kill a fraction of the people in the U.S. when compared to hand guns.
- This week has been pretty much surreal for me. On Monday, I attended my very first faculty meeting! I met the new principal, and got introduced to all of the teachers and staff at Mill Creek Elementary. On Tuesday, I attended my first all-day teacher workshop where we talked about changes to the curriculum this year. I also spent several days with my site teacher (let's call her Mrs. H) setting up our classroom!
Family dinner.
There are events and fun things planned throughout the weekend (to be announced…but, I know with Sue there…it’s gonna be BIG junk fun!), and FOLK Magazine will be all set up with 15 vendors in their very own barn – one more reason to visit! Stop by their facebook event page.
the loops doesn´t consist of freedom or the cure of cancer
How Many Calories Does Yoga Really Burn?
Basil Copper – Cry Wolf
Rachel Claire is the creator and sole designer of the Rachel Claire Collection. The Rachel Claire Collection combines the usefulness and energies of natural gemstones to spread peace, strength and courage, in the hopes of promoting self sufficiency and love. Also, all her sterling silver jewelry is under $30!
A thirst for discipline
What is Pay It Forward 2012? I got this fun activity from one of my FB friend, Saskia. It’s about giving away 5 handcrafted pieces to 5 persons who left comment on your status. Then, those 5 person have to post it on their status, and give away another 5 handcrafted pieces, etc, etc, etc. Isn’t it fun?
At stake: the eyeballs of more than 100 million Super Bowl viewers. And the urgent need to drive all of them online to find out more, socialize and tweet with friends and ultimately buy that beer, smartphone or luxury car.
(Note: It’s super-easy and super-fast, and you can easily halve or double the recipe.)
Take refrigerated leftover mashed yams. Add about ½ cup of flour to absorb the moisture (you may need more or less). Form into patties and fry until golden brown. Enjoy!
So, if I want to write about adult manga, particularly yaoi, the stuff that got to me, as it were, I can't, off-hand, think of a better place to start than with ISHIHARA Satoru's Afuresou na Pool which is saying something. Like, unfortunately, the bulk of the yaoi I've enjoyed, I can't find it licensed in English, but there are several manga scanlation sites that have the whole six volume series. Well worth the time, in my opinion.
Last week, I got experience an amazing workshop with ACMI, involving creating, acting, directing, shooting and editing your own masterpiece of a film!
There are numerous other reasons to save your own seed, including the possibility of a plant adapting to ones specific environmental conditions over time. This is something we have experienced in our own gardens and has been especially noticeable with our peas and tomatoes becoming much less prone to disease compared to how they were many years ago, we have had no issues at all the past few seasons.
What does the new album sound like?
I thought I was mistaken
The heavily tattooed Barrio Azteca gang members have long operated across the border in El Paso, dealing drugs and stealing cars. But in Ciudad Juarez, the organization now specializes in contract killing for the Juarez drug cartel. According to U.S. law enforcement officers, it may have been involved in as many as half of the 2,660 killings in the city in the past year.
The gingerbread house Abby made and entered in a local contest. Do you notice where she placed the gingerbread man? Ha! I love my almost 3 year old!
I got this gorgeous stamp set called Victorian Lady by Woodware a couple of weeks ago from The Craft Outlet near where I live. Have been itching to use it. I simply stamped and embossed it with clear embossing powder. Kept it quite simple by just adding a touch of colour to the hat brim and the bow. The patterned paper is a new one I got from Papermania. I used my trusty Big Shot to emboss the red panels. Just love my Big Shot machine. Added some ribbon across the centre, some pearls, feathers and flowers to finish.
History has given us one important lesson of how uncontrolled immigration can destroy a nation. We must take heed before it is too late.
Any newspaper columnist whose thoughts are “edited”, with inconvenient words and phrases slashed to suit the business or political convenience of a newspaper, and the integrity of his thoughts violated, would howl in fury.
Allison deserved his own scan, too!
Good Sunday to you!!
03 Stay As Sweet As You Are 4:35
B:Beautiful-I’m finally starting to feel it!
1942 - 1970. Apparently it took the town authorities 28 years to build a new market building, but by the time it was built, the era had changed. People wanted solidity. Historical buildings were subject to fire and collapse, and new dreams were needed.
Confused? Don’t worry, so am I! But I’m just going along with it, Mom knows what to do, so I’ll just follow her. Again, LOL. (It's a good time to only be 12+1 years old. I don't have to have all the answers.)
As always any comments are most welcome,
Loved Iris...
I had a Russian friend of mine at work check it out. She expertly crinkled it up in one hand (it's not dried out, that's good), checked the fur for cracks (none), checked the weight (light and lofty, good quality), looked for shedding (none) and checked the shine and smell (all good). She said I got a good deal and that it is a high quality old mink.
For yes, it is she
CONTINUATIONS
Today it doesn't matter that Husband is starting to have second thoughts about building an office onto the house and that I may be destined to use the dining room as an office forever. We will end up making the decision that is right for us. I haven't cancelled the architect just yet.
According to a report., Public officials in India may be cornering as much as Rs.92,122 crore ($18.42 billion), or 1.26 per cent of the GDP, through corruption.
Tears were falling from her beautiful eyes as she felt the pain all over her body.
Early March in Alaska when winter clings desperately for survival against the increasing daylight and warmth.
We had tried everything with Mr. McKelvey–drugs, electroshock, Wheel of Fortune–but nothing seemed to calm his agitated mind. He would wander the wards, enter other patients’ rooms and move their personal items–family photos, eyeglasses, much-beloved tchotchkes–not out of malice, as we ultimately learned, but from a deep-seated sense of aggrieved mischief-making, which is totally different.
Nga Wahine Pasifika
I’ll boat through Venice in my dreams
Mom has had a terrible cold for the last three weeks. Actually it was more than a cold, and her doctor was worried that it would settle into her lungs. She is on her second round of antibiotics and hopefully this will knock it out! The sickness hit her really hard, and I think that her immune system still isn't up to par, even though she hasn't had a chemo treatment for a while. She does sound better today than she has all week, her voice isn't as raspy and nasal-ey. Mom pretty much stuck to the indoors and didn't go out much the last two weeks, and I was too afraid to go out and see her and bring more germs as Scotty and Tom both had bad colds the last couple of weeks as well. Fortunately she has great neighbors and friends to look in on her - especially neighbor Mike (right next door) who is a surprisingly good cook and baker.
Method of preparation
I sat up until eleven in the hope of seeing the Gay and Lesbian Band but without success. When Sky said the parade might last another two hours I gave up and went to bed.
Imagine having a permanent "Christmas Room" in the house! I would absolutely love it, I could do all my crafty prezzies and wrap all my gifts in there and everything would be ready in plenty of time... Bliss!
I honestly was very surprised when I saw the beer on Arthur's menu, and after I saw that on the list, I looked no further. When we lived in Hyde Park and were frequenting the café often, the only beers you could get in bottles were Bud, Miller, Coors and Sierra. Maybe they have a beer geek doing the purchasing these days.
I wanted to write a story where the female characters are as powerful and, more importantly, respected by their male companions. Billi’s a skilful warrior and the Templars know that. By Dark Goddess she’s part of the Order and there are no questions asked. Then we have the Amazonian Polenitsy, my tribe of female werewolves. Their leader, Old Grey, is like Arthur, wise, dedicated and deadly. But she’s a grandmother who feels love for her wayward grand-daughter but will let nothing stand in her way.
Still my garden is looking lush and lovely for it and so I guess every cloud DOES have a silver lining (literally, lol).
Tonight's the big night! Kathleen is so excited about the Kindergarten ball!! Dances have been practiced, preparations done all we need is our best dresses, suits, cameras and our smiles! I am so looking forward to this magical night with Kathleen. It was only a few short years ago I had the opportunity to go with Hayley. My time surely does fly by!
We checked out the mangalitsa stalls and then wandered around the food and vendor stalls, too. We shared some fresh chips from a food cart and I grabbed some ice cream, too. Once we’d had our fill we wandered back home. Even though there wasn’t that much to distinguish this festival from the others (aside from the pig stalls), it was a lovely way to spend an afternoon and I’m glad these types of festivals happen relatively frequently here.
To prepare barbecue sauce, combine all ingredients except the chicken, in a medium bowl.
What follows is a real Indiana Jones story that had me completely absorbed from start to finish. First the desert must be navigated, then there are mountains to cross, only for the exhausted trio to find themselves embroiled in a bitter tribal war on the other side. It could have been so dull, but Quatermain's plentiful dry humour and beautiful flights of description proved irresistable. The excitement and suspense is genuinely riveting - there are a couple of deliciously gruesome moments that sent me mentally diving behind my sofa cushion - and when I reached the last page I felt utterly bereft. Having been so completely immersed in the trio's African exploits, I wasn't quite sure what I could read next that could POSSIBLY compare (always the sign of a great book!).
Steve finally decided to catch up.
the "shocked and horrified this unexplainable thing has happened" school director from yesterdays school was.....also the director of the previous school where she worked when found guilty of extortion.
But what of Moses? For this example we look at Exodus 3:10-11. Moses was in the backside of the desert when he heard God speaking to him out of the burning bush.
Little lamb, little lamb,
This is the final week of our Affordable Art Show and I'm pleased to say that it has been a wonderful success. This annual exhibition usually is. Everything is priced under £500 and we exhibit works by thirty or more successful Scottish artists, but this year it has been especially good. And this is especially good news in these less than abundant times.
I cite all this history because the history of America, along with a careful analysis of its demographics, its population, native-born and naturalized, portends that, once we get past the megolomania and Marxist ideology of the current pretender to the throne…oops, I mean to the Oval Office, America is ideally poised to dig itself out of its current financial difficulties.
Jeffrey A. Hersch, 53, New York, N.Y.
from hence your memory death cannot take,
And although it is early days yet, as the gas supplies become more plentiful, we will see wind become less and less attractive. Politically, it is no longer sustainable. The reality has to catch up soon, although one can see the vested interests attempting a rearguard action.
I don't think he even reads this blog. If he did, though, I guess I would want him to get to the end of this post knowing -- "ok. I am worth thinking about."
They were taken on a detour by the GPS in their hire car and when they arrived at their bed and breakfast, the front entrance was closed.
so without further ado here's what we got up to :
See what I mean by the "cone"? The black double knit flares out as it falls, while the thin, red tissue knit almost falls straight down. When you compare them to the print, you can see that the way they fall is different. The white, which is the one I chose, forms a cone that is very similar to the print, which told me that they would sew well together.
And even as I turn the next corner, I take a moment now to pay tribute to my two wonderful children and share a poem that I wrote for them before they were born, before I knew them, and whose words they embody every day even without knowing it.
New objects in my neat (because-I-threw-everything-else-to-the-other-side-for-the-photo) corner of the room:
Jeffrey M. Chairnoff, 35, West Windsor, N.J.
Dress – Christos (purchased and altered at Kleinfeld’s, New York, NY)
English so he could share his newfound knowledge with other people.
Going off on a tangent here, but today I had one of the best cups of coffee ever. And it was bought at an unusual place for buying coffee. A little gift shop filled with awesome quirky jewelry and interesting clothes. As I walked in, I could smell the wondrous aroma of freshly brewed coffee. And of course I simply couldn’t walk out without buying a cup. It’s complicated being me, okay.
I really AM still around! I can't believe it's been ALL SUMMER since I posted last!
In the 1989 show, I burned through an hour’s worth of energy in our 14 minute set. I was pacing back and forth like a caged animal, barking out our second last song – our cover of Steppin’ Stone (we still didn’t play the hard part). Those who know the Sex Pistols’ version can attest to this. There are a lot of vocals in a short stretch of space. So, I was already short on breath when I attempted the jump.
My list of techniques (some stolen from Reana Louise):
Ask the children to read the scriptures and find which one answers each question. Show the children a picture of Noah building the ark. Explain that sometimes it is hard to choose the right. Ask, "How was Noah blessed for choosing the right?" Encourage the children to share how they will be blessed as
A mother's mind can accept whatever it needs to accept.......
Skin dermatitis can be treated with the use of Essential Oils.
How can you not feel that your nurturing and carrying them through the world and seeing them fulfilling their potential, laughing and enjoying themselves, be something that gives you so much pleasure that it feels you’ve done such a good job?
Featuring The Triur Trio
Final thought for the day: am I now (1) religiously taking aspirin OR (2) opting for Nick the Vic’s life support strategy? I think you know the answer to that one.
What a long update this was, but I hope you enjoyed taking a walk down memory lane with me. Up next I'll be conquering London and Berlin! Stay tuned for that! :)
Would you whisper it to your best friend?
19A. OLD ALE
Plus, have I mentioned how much I like Gidney? He's really awesome, tough and funny. Plus, Thomas Kaufman writes about D.C. with a style that's wholly his own. He captures the feel of the place perfectly. His prose reflects the hardboiled sensibilities of a modern Raymond Chandler, but does so in a fresh and unique way.
of a year gone by.
There are so many ways we can help others if we look around where we live. And sometimes we find ways of helping that is just so much fun!! I encourage you to see if there are ways you can help out hurting needy people in a way that is not work to you, but just fun!!
In separate bowls, put the milk and the flour. Add salt and pepper to the flour. Put the tortilla crumbs on a plate. Dip the stuffed jalapenos into the milk, then into the flour. Shake off the excess flour. Do this to all of the peppers.
I am flattered and utterly excited to be joining an innovative new company called Style Spies. Style Spies was started by 2 Kansas City natives, Mollie and Erin. These busy Mom's wanted to start something that combined all the things they love and are passionate about, and still be able to do it from home and be with their kids. This is how Style Spies was born! Mollie and Erin have an extensive background fashion and have had the opportunity to work for some of the best companies in the nation.
The funny thing about my diet this time is that I am attempting to learn how to run as well. I am just finishing week 3 and guess how I feel? C25K can kiss my you know what. I hate it. At this point I do not understand how people become so obsessed with this sport. When I played soccer I at least felt like I served a purpose… but now, I just run and stare at myself in the tv screen at the gym. I also have a habit of near-death treadmill experiences on a daily basis (look for the Accident Prone post in the near future).
1 boxing
And the list is endless… but to all those cheating out there – you will only feel it when its done to you and don’t worry one day you will be the victim of someone else’s WEAK MOMENT!
Chanel Fall/Winter 2010-2011: Well I don’t know about you, but I loved the Yeti suit (now you’re definitely going to look at that link right??)! I think it’s safe to say that Karl Lagerfeld really wants us to be warm this fall/winter. And to that, I say, WELL DONE, SIR! I’m always cold, it’s like a disease or something. I suffer greatly, beyond all telling. However, looking at these fuzzy, snuggly ensembles in Chanel’s famous tweed is almost enough to make my hands warm up. They feature dolmain sleeves, A-line dresses, and enough (fake) fur panels to heat up even me. And the fur boots! Love the length. Love the fact that boots are still hitting the knees and beyond. (This was also showcased in both Burberry Prorsum’s and Dior’s collections, with all those thigh-high boots.) Mr. Lagerfeld wants us to jingle and jangle too, I suppose, because he’s decked some of his ladies out with jewelry enough to glam the Rockefeller Center Christmas tree. That’s fine by me. I love using a statement necklace to add depth and colors to what might otherwise be a simple outfit.
I thought I had my head around most conversions particularly in regard to US versus Australian names for ingredients but have come across some new facts recently.
shrouds and bags of spice–
One of my favourite jewellery stalls I came across during LFW was the Disney Couture for Mawi stall. They're currently stocked over at ASOS and I adore the pink Minnie Mouse designs for next season. I think my favourite has to be the ring, we could definitely do with more statement jewellery in our lives right? I'll definitely be looking out for it when it's stocked next season...
We're not going to get anything done. That's more than a promise. It's a fact. And that is the most compelling argument for my reelection. If you vote for me there will be four more years of "Meh." You know that during any second term the administration is a burnt-out, crippled mess. The team goes back to the West Wing hobbled by all the old predictable scandals, and all the naive policies that finally had time to blow up in our faces. Plus, we'll be facing off against a Congress that would fight us if we wanted to buy Labrador puppies with little American flag collars for wounded veterans. I'll spend the remainder of my term squabbling with those assholes on the Hill about the most idiotic issues you can imagine. And you already know what they are, because they'll be the same idiotic issues as last time. We'll play chicken with the debt ceiling and someone will say some stupid crap about women or Catholics or Catholic women, and we'll posture about the Middle East like we know what the hell we're doing.
Good thing Marian Gaborik finally ended his goal scoring drought with 5:19 left in the third overtime. If he hadn’t the game might have lasted forever. The way Alex Ovechkin’s golden chance bounced off the post in the first overtime and later on the way Mike Rupp’s open net opportunity was blocked by his own teammate Brian Boyle, you’d think that everyone had conspired to keep the game going as long as possible.
Low Bought In: NA
Some people wouldn’t see any point in standing here under the trees, in hanging around this quiet street, watching and waiting. But Tom knew you could learn a lot by just keeping still; and you never knew when that might prove useful.
And you should certainly expect more from the United States Navy, that's for sure.
and helpless…okay, maybe let’s skip a few years. In January 2010, I had a baby (a wonderful, magnificent, sweet baby named Ben). He slept through the night from under 3 months old, in addition to napping 3-plus hours in the day. Being on maternity leave, I had an AWFUL lot of free time on my hands that I was COMPLETELY not used to having (a year—I live in Canada). So naturally, instead of relaxing, I decided to write a book—something I’ve always wanted to do, but had been too intimidated to try.
No, no and no again!
“Well, because they wanted to scare the kids.”
As every journey starts with a single step, perhaps the first stage should be to get Patents Court pleadings on the net, followed by skeleton arguments. This is a small volume of paper, usually submitted electronically, and they are (usually) masterful discussions of the law. This alone would make a superb resource on several fronts, including providing a shop window for counsel and the UK litigation system.
By the way, Sarah plans to do a LIVE hangout tonight (Sat Apr 28) at 10pm EST to talk about the issues re the student demonstrations. If you live in Montreal or in Quebec, watch out for Sarah’s Hangout or invite.
#1 has her first official day at the hospital as a nursing student. She is staying here at home on her clinical nights. She will have her own patient to attend to. She went in today to get the paper work for her patient and got a bit overwhelmed and nervous. She will be working with post surgical patients. The worst part is that she has to be there at 6:45 AM..... everyday. It makes me laugh and cry all at the same time. All through school, she was the WORST about getting up and being ready on time. It has been really nice not having to fight with her about getting out of the bed the past few years and now here I am back at square one.
Churchill asked his staff to find out about problems in Lambeth, Brixton and Cardiff. B.G.Smallman, PS, to the Colonial Secretary, producing a paper on “The Coloured Population of the UK". This estimated the numbers to be 40-50,000 which included about 6,000 students. (3)
I finished, and headed with another person on the trip to the pool on the other end of the property. We looked up at all the trees and foliage as we relaxed our feet in the cool, non-chlorinated water. I chatted with this fellow student about our first impression of Haiti, our research, and of religion. I wouldn’t say I forget how easy it can be to relate to new people, but it is a nice surprise when you find yourself immersed in a conversation with another so comfortably.
Lord knows there's a lot I need to change,
It's when events like this come up that I realize that I never go anywhere anymore. I still have my corporate wardrobe - the things I'd wear to work everyday. But my weekend clothes have gotten shabby or (more likely) too tight. I tend to wear the same couple of things to everything, especially as the weather has moved from winter to spring. I just don't clean up that well lately. I've fallen in love with my yoga pants (so comfy, so soft, so forgiving!) and I feel like a cranky baby when I have to gird my loins with jeans or some other similarly tight pants. It's a real dilemma.
MERRY CHRISTMAS !
I was taken aback at first, having braced myself to respond if the gift she requested was something we couldn't afford or didn't think she should have. Her request was simple enough. She wanted her little sister home. God is preparing all of our children, and it has been beautiful to watch.
Happy knitting:)
May the sun shine warm upon your face,
The first thing I noticed is the fresh smell. The second was how seamlessly it blended with my hair. Some dry shampoos leave a powdery finish, creating a Grandma Butterworth look. Not cute. And certainly not discreet! I sprayed the TRESemme Fresh Start in my roots, waited a few minutes before combing it through, then I had fresh hair that looked like it'd just been washed!
Did you enter the Flourishes Blog Hop by commenting either here on my blog, or on the CopicOz Blog, or Mandi's or even on the Copic Marker Australia Facebook Page?? If you did, then I'm sure you will be dying to know who won one of these gorgeous Flourishes stamps!!!!
Of ALL the stories that have made it into the public sphere about the PM, of all the stories that have the world laughing at us and making Trinis the butt of jokes everywhere….noise making is the libellous story…so then the story about your family living at the PM’s residence true? The story about the Govt Credit Card paying for the Louis Vee boots true too? The story about you using at least 2 helicopters everytime you travel correct as well? The story about the $2,000 a day for your hairdresser correct as well? The Elevator story correct too? So, Vidwattie and her son’s really living at the State’s expense, then?
Mrs. Rivers was apparently returning home to her apartment in Governor's Estates at 50 Governor's Rd. after a shopping trip to the grocery store on the northeast corner of the busy intersection, about 11:35 a.m. on Thursday, Aug. 14.
CIOs need to listen to their inner voice and recommend changes accordingly.
I think something is burning,
6. Through much of my lifetime, Turkey seemed to have one military coup after another.
You and I, frozen there, after a war
Happy CCC Week!
TROUBLESHOOTING
Celebs are the number one face of the peplum fashion. Red carpet wear uses the peplum over and over, on dresses, skirts, tops and jackets. Photos of Emma Watson have been all over the web for months now after she wore a sparkling peplum top to the her last premiere. Rihanna also rocked a long peplum gown on the red carpet as did Michele Williams at the Oscars this year. Irina Shayk, Blake Lively, Scarlett Johansson, Katy Perry, Naomi Watts, Kate Middleton, Zooey Deschanel, Rachel Zoe… You name her, she’s wearing it !
If you thought someone you loved was in trouble and needed your help… Maybe it’s the same sort of principle that fuels most cons — preying on our deepest fears and our deepest desires.
-Is very into calling people by their names. Like everyone. Her teachers, her babysitters, friends, etc. She does a pretty good job but there are a few she has a hard time saying perfectly. Mason = Macy and Lisa = Sia. Haha. Silly girl.
* Fast.
One of the “challenges” I found myself facing is the ridiculous amount of CHOICES I have here in America. I was so excited to go to the grocery store once I got back, but when I stepped in and looked just at the cereal aisle, I knew I was in over my head. Likewise, my choices at the movie theater have now increased at least x10. I’m not saying I don’t like having all these choices, but now I wonder how much more of my time will be wasted researching what product I’m willing to spend my money on.
A great book affects you not only at an emotional level - when you can't let go of the characters - or at a mental level - when you learn new words and information at every reread - but at a life level.
she can’t look, while he, guilty as usual, fearful, fascinated and uncouth, can’t not.
As I thought about our "conversation" I remembered an incidence with 002 from a few years ago.
This weekend there was a conference in Bristol all about Diana Wynne Jones. Not like the fanfests that are Harry Potter or Terry Pratchett conventions but but a proper academic conference dedicated to the work of one writer, which is a rare honour - especially in the children's book world. Sadly, in the end Diana herself was not well enough to attend, which must have been a disappointment for her as well as all those delegates and speakers gathered together.
Serve them as such, serve them as chaat, serve them with dips and your party is on fire from the starters :)
The apostle Paul is in custody and the chief Captain of the Roman army is trying to find out the truth of the uprising in Jerusalem. This was going to be done by whipping. Paul reveals to him that he was out of order for he also was a Roman citizen.
Sometime ago I was walking one of the not-much-used trails and turned to follow what was not a trail at all, but a path of bent over grass that I assumed was made by a family of feral pigs. That led me to a little glade and then there seemed to be another path leading out of the glade. It was a path where you had to bend over to pass under branches, sort of turn sideways to get between trees. One place just seemed to lead to the next, but at the same time seem to go nowhere.
begs for stillness.
Goat cheese, crumbled or parmigiano reggiano, grated (optional)
find
But, what's with their funky CD covers? They're pretty bad maybe.
Catherine cultivated the most astonishingly irreverent continental society of bohemians, artists and aristocrats at salons in her homes. She was pals with Ravel, Debussy, Nijinsky and Proust. She was also financial patroness to Diaghilev, The Ballet Russe de Monte Carlo and Cecil Beaton. (why buy art when you can buy artists?)
I wish I had had the courage and sense to start out by approaching the publishers whose books I loved the most. As I needed to earn money urgently, I took on whatever commissions fell into my lap. I put my heart into ephemeral outlets and often with no good art direction.
So nice to have sunshine this time of year isn't it..
In other news I just sold 6 paintings. I believe I undervalued and undersold them. I wish now that I would not have done this, but I do hope that they found good homes and that those who now own them care for them. I loved them, they were my babies. It was hard for me to part with them. Some part of me wants to care for every beautiful thing which I make.
When your baklava is done, remove it from the oven. Let it sit for 15 minutes or so, then ladle the syrup over it; use all the syrup:
The Detailer Brush is very small, dense, slightly stiff but comfortable on the skin. With a slightly pointed tip this is great for spot/scar concealment as it really lays the product down exactly where you want it.
I layered lots of My Mind's Eye papers and stamped the bird image from the kit on to another piece of patterned paper before layering it on lace and adding a ribbon trim.
My take is that if you feel like you’re being a sleazebag, maybe you’re doing something wrong. Or maybe you’re just approaching things in the wrong way. The interests of client and publisher are often very similar: let’s get the best book out there and make the most money. There are differences of agreement, rights to battle over, and money to beg for (the best part!), but in the end, there aren’t two oppositional sides in this business. At least, there certainly shouldn’t be.
We usually try to have a couple times a year when her and I go to a weekend crop together but with her teaching schedule it wasn't going to work this spring. So that Saturday we set up the TV and DVD player in my scrapbook room and set up tables for both of us. We're both fans of The Big Bang Theory and it's easy to watch it and scrapbook.
I used my Gypsy & Cricut to design & create this project.
LOS ANGELES — Los Angeles City Council members called on TV and radio broadcasters to keep their hosts from spewing crude slurs, citing KFI radio calling Whitney Houston a “crack ho.”
I highly recommend any book in the Little House on the Prairie series. We are now onto Farmer Boy, as Olivia has decided that she needs a break from Mary, Laura, Pa, and Ma. I agree. She has taken to calling Mike “Pa” and me “Ma.”
UPDATE: So I watched the Glee version of the Time Warp (I don't have proper TV, so I have to wait till next week to see the full episode online). I'm not a Glee watcher, and I saw this clip totally out of context from the rest of episode, but let's judge it!
We leave for Telluride, CO., the very next day for our guncle Seth's retirement party. Back to Austin for a few weeks of camp, then off to France on June 30th. Still to do: passports, arranging apartment stay, writing my curriculum for my course that I am teaching on Fashion & Design, moving Ecole to its new location and last but not least: getting everything ready to finish the book in Paris!
“Ohh sorry, some work”
Tomorrow is one of my favorite fests of the year--Portland Cheers to Belgian Beers. The conceit of the fest is simple: everyone gets the same yeast(s*) and brews a beer in one of four general quadrants of type (pale or dark, strong or weak). People go, taste, and vote. The winning brewery gets to select the yeast for next year.
The canvases in Mark Moore range from one epic panel, to a squarish enigmatic sliver of color either on or under a overcoating of black, to a large grouping of smaller works that use the grid format of the wall to create even further interactions. The many drawings that accompany the show are a nice view into Bavingtons working method.
The Muslims should have known better than to f*** with an armed liberal.
- Truffle with Fig (fig chunks & fig puree) – Paired w/ Sundog Amber Ale
This might be a stretch for some of you on how this could be inspiration for a bay window area. I understand. It is a stretch. What I focused on was the wood walls and white window frames.
Just never forget to be dexterous and deft.
Most of you who were in the military are no longer, but I believe the mindset has been planted firmly in many and you are unable to recognize the inherent power you, as individuals, possess. It is unfortunately to your detriment.
First of all, choose a design that complements the style of your home and enhances its appearance. You can find a full range of DIY conservatories designs, from modern lean to style to the more impressive Edwardian or Victorian designs. You can also enjoy an impressive degree of design freedom, from classic to contemporary, so you can create the conservatory that perfectly suits your needs and tastes.
With this relocation comes a new sound too, a further excursion into Mount’s fascinating brain. The restless pace of 2008’s Nights Out is tempered with frequent moments of calm, and the insistent top layer of squelchy falsetto replaced with more modest, lithe hooks. She Wants is newly sentimental, adding a personal touch to the more generalised feelings the songs had previously explored, while Everything Goes My Way has a female lead vocal and the glamour of a John Hughes film from the 1980s. The latter is deliciously summery, but one of the album’s weakest for how uncompelling its structure is.
But make sure these games are played under your strict surveillance and limited time or else this could also affect their studies if they become too addicted. So, no matter how tempted you are at wanting to allow them to enjoy playing flash games for a longer time, harden your heart and be a strict parent disciplining your child the correct way!
I used a combination of fontina, parmesan, and fresh goat cheese, but you can just as easily use gruyere in place of fontina and skip the goat cheese or use cream cheese instead. I sauteed onions and tossed in fresh spinach until wilted. If you wish to use frozen spinach instead, be sure to squeeze out as much of the water as possible otherwise you will end up with a runny quiche!
So please, for the love of all things on sale, do not continue to torture your husbands this way!
Lovers hate to be distant
Goodmorning, It is cold here, and hard to get out of bed. If you live where it gets cold like that, you know what I mean.
Share our personal stores far beyond the choir. Climate change and renewable energy are not vote turning issues for the majority of our population. Less than 2% voting Green. If more engaged in NDP or Sask Party, then big shift. 250 Green votes in Regina South meant nothing.
financial loan Stint
Planting Citrus Trees
The Prince of Pot believes the drug legalization campaign he’s waged for more than 30 years is already over at the "intellectual" level. And it’s only a matter of time before marijuana and other recreational drugs are sold in stores in Canada and the U.S. – and taxed and regulated just like liquor and cigarettes.
And for The Impossible Princess's dancing concert, she needed a high ponytail with straight hair.
Im getting ready to embark on some new adventures, and its funny I have been asked if I am scared to pursue this journey and the answer is an astounding no!
She snaps and tells the world that this crazy bitch, in this peaceful house is gonna hurt me. She is gonna get me. She doesn’t like me cause I’m the bomb. She knows how to play the game. She tells the owner of these cottages these made up stories.
Like Boswell observes in Life–some people have a foolish way of not minding or pretending not mind, what they eat. For my part I mind my belly studiously and very carefully for I look it that a person who does not mind his belly will hardly minds anything else.
The response was way bigger than I thought it would be and the questions very different then I thought they would be (I didn’t think there would be so many personal questions!) Because I was pulling the questions from multiple areas I apologize if I missed any. I tried to answer all of them.
“Through Wolf’s Eyes” by Jane Lindskold - This book looks like “Julie of the Wolves” meets epic fantasy. I’m intrigued.
Episode 5 saw Ben Harman’s murdered ex-mistress Hayden McClaine had returned from the dead, as did former residents of Murder House; culminating in a discovery by Tate that he’s a ghost as well. And a discovery by Violet, that Tate is actually Constance’s son (though we’d already worked that one out as they do look very similar).
In the future, I may do a post on “what makes a good book trailer” but for the time being, just note how the music (in the above trailer) perfectly fits the book, the images are nice, the review snippets are kept at a minimum but still come at the right time, and the text is short but in sync with the rest of the trailer.
What I loved about this book is that it inspires a love for history! Although the book is fictional, the plot interweaves fact and fiction so delicately that it allows for the reader to learn interesting facts about our sixteenth president in a way that is not too preachy, but more of an insider's view of the type of life Abe Lincoln might have had up until his presidential election. It touches lightly on political issues of the time such as poverty and slavery, giving children a glimpse into what life would have been like during such trying times. The suggested age range is appropriate in both reading level and interest and I would even recommend it to earlier readers if you want to read it aloud to your child, as there are enough interesting and entertaining illustrations that a younger child can easily associate the pictures with the spoken words.
St. Feuillien Saison
I scribbled down the address and agreed to drive over the following morning.
turned.
Today, my son was bummed. He said that "A's" job hasn't' paid him back rent. The company that recently hired him hasn't paid anyone.A's family is beginning to call him a "loser". I'm sorry for how that must hurt A, but he is so lost. B has tried to get him into treatment, but A isn't ready.
reasonable ideas here. But importantly. My (barry) internet is total
West Bromwich Albion 1
“Our investigation focused on what the average woman would experience if she sought an abortion in Texas, and how the abortion clinics appeared and operated on an everyday basis,” said Newman.
Taste&Create was started as a food event by Nicole from For the Love of Food. It’s whole purpose was, and has been, to create a community of bloggers who test each others’ recipes and share links. It has also been to help new and not so well known bloggers get their foot in the door of the foodie community.
The day I went to volunteer, the coordinator took me to the librarian in the children’s section and introduced me as ‘This is Piyali, she is our new library grandparent!’ The children’s librarian looked at me, chuckled and said, ‘She doesn’t look like a grandparent to me, may be we should call her something else?’ Thank you!!! But the coordinator had better things to do than get into the nitty-gritty of names. What’s in a name anyway? So there I was, serving the community as a library grandparent for two years.
Rather than tracing the outline
As publishers go, Samhain's operations seem more transparent than others. They constantly keep their authors up to speed, and own-up when things go awry. I like that.
On another whole subject, I think I'm going to start telling people Stella's name is Boom-chaka-laka-laka.
A report, since denied, claims that Iran has told Hezbullah not to attack Israel. A senior Iranian official ordered Hezbollah Secretary General Hassan Nasrallah to refrain from striking Israel, several media outlets in Iran reported Wednesday.
Well, it's been a while since we graced the Internets with our presence. At least for me...Well..shit went down. What happened? Simply put: I left Stupid. I gathered up six die-hard friends, grabbed my shit, grabbed Kidlette, and high-tailed it the fuck out of there. Served him papers the next day, and now I await with baited breath his response, which has yet to be forthcoming. In the meantime, I do everything I can just to keep my proverbial shit together.
When I was growing up, we didn’t have a whole lot, but my dad had a small insurance, but medical care costs weren’t that much. And you should have an opportunity — medical care insurance should be given to you as an individual, so if you’re employed or not employed, you have — you just take care of that and you keep it up. When you lose a job, sometimes you lose your insurance.
Broken China Distress Ink
That’s my opinion anyway.
Detroit City
Gallatin Church of Christ
I remember the dream clearly. When I finally awoke from one nightmare and into another, I had been crying for some time.
Build up--and keep building up--a surplus of what you normally use anyway. And then keep your mouth shut!
Alice In Chains - Greatest Hits
“Individualism erases the importance of divine authority.” — Dallin Oaks
Anyways, I feel like there were a bunch of surprises last week!
There’s no doubt that I miss many aspects of working at a newspaper and the rush of working the desk when news is breaking. I miss being a journalist. The job security certainly makes up for that, and it’s nice not bracing for the next round of layoffs. There were six in five years that I survived before finally being laid off by the Tribune newspaper in Newport News, Va., along with nearly all desk people.
If you are going on a ride anytime soon you will need to remember one thing, to wear your bike helmet just to be safe and not get a ticket. Even if you are not riding on the street you should wear a helmet.
Peel potatoes and boil (I cook them in the pressure cooker because it’s faster). Drain.
It's not the kind if thing
Ultrasound Friday AM as well- hopefully little lady is growing well- she certainly is moving plenty, though I have contemplated bringing my doppler in my bag to work to have it at the ready should I feel less movement and start going psycho. I start weekly non-stress tests in two weeks. Can we just get through the end of January and then get her the hell out? I feel the vultures circling.
Value$: A Mixed Economy, the book I wrote which inspired a lot of my spiritual work combining with the economics and social commentary here, ironically, is largely about the defeatist attitude found all over North America except a few pockets. As you will see expanded upon in another posting soon (Essential Education, Part II), many cultures in Asia think as North Americans and Europeans used to – very big and very optimistically. I am certainly not idealizing any place, but these lessons of effectiveness in certain areas of work and society are transferable.
So many years I have gone from Palm Sunday and Christ’s triumphal entry straight to Easter morning and His resurrection. I haven’t really spent time thinking about the bloody and bruised and humiliated Christ. It’s so much more pleasant to think of beautiful baby Jesus in the manger and Christ in flowing white robes than to think of Christ covered in blood and torn flesh. But it’s SO important to remember daily just how deep the Father’s love for us was and is. And yes, Christ died for the sins of all mankind, but never doubt for one second that He would have gone through it all, JUST FOR YOU!
In the future, I will be sure to check the companies supplying the RRs before I make my gameplans!
The speaker said that no one is willing to default on the full faith and credit of the U.S., according to the person.
Nowadays, I feel like many of us have forgotten the beauty of walking, myself included. I can barely find the strength or desire to walk all the way from Vedder to the Observatory for 9am class every Monday, Wednesday and Friday. Can you blame me though? But, in all honesty, what’s a ten minute walk? We have become so dependent on other means of transportation, like cars, shuttle buses, taxis, and so on, that it has trapped us in a lazy, inactive mindset. So, my proposal to change the world is to go take a walk… on the wild side?
Riddle Answer: In a dictionary.
If people don’t go to hell, then there is no need for a savior. If peoples don’t go to hell, then Jesus’ work on the cross and the suffering he endured as a human being was in vein. It wasn’t needed. He did it just for fun.
“Never thought I’d die fighting side by side with an Elf.”
First step was to strip her of her hardware, and sand the rough and worn patches:
PS; This is probably the most "natural" state of my hair you'll ever see (you know, with extensions). This is what my hair looks like after I wash it and let it air dry. Not straight but not curly. It's nice and easy haha
Previously Arsenal had gained enough points that required Newcastle United to win their remaining four games scoring forty goals in the process. This match confirmed the destination of the title as Highbury. Having fallen two points short of retaining the Champions mantle in the previous campaign – they had a superior goal difference to eventual title winners Everton – Arsenal set about regaining the trophy with a zest.
If when turning the circle to reveal the secret picture the flaps come out of the slots to easily, you have two choices. One is to put a bit of tape folded to prevent the flaps from moving back that far, but then there will always be a bit of the secret picture covered. The other alternative is to carefully tape pieces of cardpaper to the back of the circle with the slots, so the flaps rest on the extensions and will go back through the secret picture easier.
Here is how the short conversation took place.
...and thinking that the modern era has come up with all sorts of 'rhetorical terms' too, no represented in a book which has gathered together the 'classical' terms ie the ones from Ancient Greece and Rome with some medieval ones added in, I think.
Wash the rice till water runs clear and then soak in warm water for a while (optional)
when worries are getting you down a bit by all means pray and don't you quit.
Other than the final Castle and Beckett scene, their other significant moment took place in the hospital after visiting an unsuspecting murder suspect (no pun intended). While it annoyed me that they were still using thinly veiled language to beat around the bush and NOT actually talk about themselves, I did really like when Beckett said a person has to feel safe in order to face life-altering moments. This is a big deal for her because it accounts for much of her hesitation regarding a relationship with Castle. It encompasses her trust issues, her shooting, her post-traumatic stress, hiding in her mother’s murder, and the concern that Castle’s been divorced twice already. Therefore, it’s also a big deal that she shared this idea of safety with him. It’s something that Castle should know if they are ever going to make their relationship work.
And since the fam is celebrating my birthday on Cinco de Mayo, I’ll get all of that out of the way before being super strict. Speaking of Cinco de Mayo, I went to PT last night. Not for treatment… I was there for the food! Every year, they celebrate the clinic’s anniversary with a Cinco de Mayo feast. All patients–past and present–are invited to partake in dinner. Scott and Dy cook it and it’s a blast.
Doug: This one hits the ground running. The splash page features our hero with his young charge, Jim Wilson, facing a barrage of bullets. When last we saw these two, Hulk had just vanquished the Constrictor -- a super-baddie who had a hit on young Wilson! As New York's Finest continue to blast away, Hulk keeps moving forward until eventually the boys in blue have fled or had (as in the case of the last brave fool) their weapons crushed in a big green fist. But what should our wondering eyes next reveal to us? How about a huge box truck from Stark International that stops right on Hulk's doorstep, opens, and unleashes a huge robot-like construct -- the Quintronic Man!
My proven methods cask light onto your darkest fears.
They both seem to be ambrosia to mosquito's, their anti mosquito protection going to bed routine takes quite some time. They have the plug in deterrents, they spray the room, they wipe stuff they buy from the chemist on any exposed skin, they wear full length pyjamas, they both sleep inside a net they bought in Ikea and they tuck themselves oh so carefully in and still they are bitten to death. I did nothing, not a thing and I wasn't bitten at all. This made my mother a tad tetchy.
My younger sister, Erin, who was unable to dance this year due to injury, was one of the many who wanted to look her absolute best when she couldn’t dance, so I put together an outfit for her to wear yesterday. I paired an off-white sequined tank from Ann Taylor with a pair of grey wool shorts from Jack Wills, a black silk trimmed blazer from Banana Republic, and a pair of suede ankle booties. The outfit was a statement, but also practical; she was comfortable, but looked effortlessly polished as well.
In our married life we have moved 3 times, so the permanence of a physical place can not be home. This last place had 4 bedrooms for the 3 of us. I don't know if it was the 4 bedrooms or my approaching the big 4 oh, but we planned on having another baby. It was a very thought through decision, there is an 8 year gap in between them because of the complications in my first pregnancy. I am telling you then and there this little one completed the circle of what I call home. She completes our family and makes it a home and that is why I have used her picture for my LO.
Candles: Will be useful when the electricity's out!
We’ll see…
08/12/2010 SELL 0.01 xauusd 1203.05
Acclaimed Bond directors John Glen (five Bond films including For Your Eyes Only, Octopussy, A View to a Kill, The Living Daylights & Licence To Kill), Martin Campbell (GoldenEye, Casino Royale) and Michael Apted (The World Is Not Enough) with special guests Olga Kurylenko (Quantum of Solace) and Caterina Murino (Casino Royale) made the Blu-ray announcement today during a Directors’ Panel discussion in the Panasonic Booth at the annual Consumer Electronics Show.
It became a World Heritage site in 1986 and is home to "fauna and flora" native to the Canaries. The peaks of the park are usually covered by humid fog, the rainforest lies beneath but has a constant temperature all year round.
“You know how much I hate a timid man!”
What colour is your bedroom?
Happy Holidays...be safe, happy and sober.
I have a lot of go-to recipes for entertaining, but these are two of my favourites. They are super easy to put together and can be prepared in advance so you have food all ready to go when guests start to arrive.
Now layer on top of that the fact that in order to build this, we had to spend a tremendous amount of money to acquire properties, to acquire condemnation, and on top of that, we have had to spend about $600 million on infrastructure, building platforms, relocating rail yards, doing subway connections, doing new sewer and water mains, rebuilding bridges over Sixth Avenue and Carlton Avenue--it’s going to cost $50 million alone just to clean up the dirty soil there. So before you put a shovel in the ground, you have close to a billion dollars in cost between the infrastructure and the land. So the basic economics demands you do a certain density if you're going to build there at all.
The trees finally have leaves!
As a result of stitching this over the weekend, I have realised that I can only stitch for an hour or two at a time now - any more hurts my hands and requires a longer rest. Therefore, it is going to take me a lot longer to complete projects than I had originally anticipated. OK, so I stitched this in less time than the magazine estimated I would, but I need to allow a larger time-frame for special events.
Cincinnati: Played pretty good down the stretch, winning their last six and the Big East title in the process.
One of the aspects of the novel that I really didn’t care for was the vampire sex. And there was a lot, in my opinion. I didn’t find that the sexual encounters furthered the story by any means, but were more of a distraction to the plotline, and I don’t need the acts spelled out for me as a reader. I know it’s a personal preference, and a lot of readers may disagree with me here, but I, personally, found these encounters to be out of place and not something I cared to read at all.
This is surprisingly sober language for an Office which in the past has threatened to sue Brazil at the WTO because of the 'local working' provision in its law apart from downgrading Thailand in its Annual 301 Report for the sole reason that its government had issue multiple CLs on pharma patents. The Indian CL decision is a combination of both the above scenario and yet we've only been threatened with a mild 'monitoring'.
We need to stay out of the way of line drives and recover foul balls so that we can stay within our budget.
And on a strange road journeyed on
They try to escape across the street where
I do applaud Lulu and Daniel Wideman, their Senior Product Manager, for introducing this particular service/product—it is the only way they are going to encourage experienced authors, institutionalized in the ideas and models of mainstream publishing, to take a deep breath and climb aboard. But here is the nub of all this. Lulu do not tell us openly the cost of this VIP service. The gathered media who were happy to interview and write about John Edgar Wideman’s decision to go with Lulu were also not prepared to ask the distinguished American author any such questions on what he payed like so many other Lulu authors. The direct question was never asked:
The other thing that keeps me searching is a personal experience that I cannot explain.
"Yeah," he smiled incredulously before turning back to a girl he'd been talking with.
It is fairly common in reading modern spiritual books to find references to U. G. Krishnamurti’s influence on both teachers and their students. His books have been translated into nearly every European language, as well as Chinese and Japanese. Widely regarded in India and Europe, The Mystique of Enlightenment is considered by U.G.’s closest associates to be the best summary of his ideas.
“Leading law firms who have used DMF to standardize their discovery approach have won new business,” continued Burns. “Corporate counsel want to know their legal team uses a proven discovery approach. Also, judges nod approvingly when lawyers demonstrate use of a good discovery approach.”
Sunday, October 28th–Sick.
-Shammy 4/15/12 11:02pm
It has been a long time since I crammed for any exam. I actually don’t remember cramming, me being the clever bugger what I was at school, but I understand the concept. I had to study but I enjoyed studying. I never got why some people needed to cram. I put it down to the fact that they’d not studied properly in the first place and this was them paying the price. But some crammed because they didn’t believe they’d studied enough even if they had. Cramming can’t be fun. It’s force-feeing yourself facts. Eating is one of life’s pleasures and even I can enjoy a good meal and time to eat it. But that’s the whole point. Eating is not just about filling your belly any more than making sure you’ve read everything that appears on Facebook and Twitter and all the rest. I never update my status because that would be one more thing for my friends to read and seriously do any of you care that much what the hell I’m doing?
The roses are from Wild Orchid Crafts and the hydrangea's are from Prima Marketing.
-4 oz. (125 g) fresh ricotta cheese
Here are the polishes I'm giving away:
People You Should Not Always Get Along With
As you become more experienced with your CMS, you may feel like you’ve found that comfortable place in which everything is working well. Remember, there’s always room for improvement, especially as the CMS is enhanced with new features that can help you work more effectively. Additionally, keep looking into the future, think about what you might need, and focus on how you will get there.
‘Thanks…’ Mr D tried to give me a semblance of a smile.
And I’m diseased by this desire of situational adoration
If both books deal with memory and experience, Peeling the Onion trains its focus on the distant history, on a now sometimes obscure, at times undoubtedly painful past: “Memory likes to play hide-and-seek, to crawl away. It tends to hold forth, to dress up, often needlessly. Memory contradicts itself; pendant that it is, it will have its way.”
we'll listen to random snippets of stranger
the government provided inadequate data in 2007 on trafficking crimes investigated or prosecuted, or on resulting convictions or sentences;
In a dutch oven, sweat onion and garlic in a little olive oil and butter. Add a bay leaf and fresh thyme. Add vegetable stock and bring to a boil. Plop in a parmesan rind to infuse a hearty, savory flavor to the soup as it simmers. It will add a wonderful umami flavor to the soup. Stir in leeks, diced potato, diced turnip and sliced cabbage, seasoning with sea salt and freshly ground pepper. To make the soup more hearty, add cooked (or canned) cannellini beans. Simmer until cooked through. Taste and adjust salt until the flavors pop. Sometimes the parmesan rind will dissolve into the soup, if it did not dissolve, simple fish it out with a slotted spoon before serving. Serve with freshly grated parmesan and crusty, toasted whole grain bread.
Anyway, pubs are closing for a variety of reasons, some of the are just really shite and would have closed even if there wasn't a ban, but we all know that the smoking ban has had a detrimental effect on the pub trade. Anyone who says it hasn't is a fucking liar.
In large soup pot cook 2 medium chopped onions with 2 tbsp olive oil, cook until onions are soft. Add 2 pounds of ground turkey and cook until done, making sure to break turkey into small pieces.
Selfish
History is one part truth. History is also one part fable. It is a site of political contestation and struggle. As the state of Arizona (with its rules banning “Ethnic Studies”) and the state of Texas (reimaging its U.S. history curriculum to conform with the Tea Party and Christian Nationalist perspective) have both embraced a more “conservative” view of history, it only seems fair and reasonable to take their efforts at face value. Theirs is not an assault on academic freedom. No, it is an effort to diversify and make more inclusive and “American” the curriculum taught to our children.
I think maybe I am starting to break through this mind mess that has held me hostage for such a long while. Sometimes I need time to process and I definitely need practice on staying in the now. I have been reading a couple of books that seem to help. My favorite is an old out of print book titled “God Calling” that my friend Diane gave me. Pam loaned me a copy of the Power of Now – I like that too.
“Amnesia?” Naida looked back to him with a curious expression.
All these, while she takes her three year old toddler to play school, gives in to the little girl's fancies and plays with her among many more regular duties as a parent.
“During the 10 sessions, each of which involved an injection, my sister and I were kept in separate bedrooms, darkened rooms, usually with someone present in the room, but I don’t know who the person was. Occasionally, my mother was also present. At times, I was so frightened by the hallucinations that I screamed and tried to escape from the room. I remember once actually reaching the hallway and being forcibly put back into the bedroom by my mother. I saw a wild array of images – nightmarish visions, occasionally provoking hysterical laughter, followed immediately by wracking sobs. I had no idea what was happening to me. It was terrifying.
Born on this day in 1960, the best player in San Diego Padre history: Tony Gwynn.
In using subversive elements for da'wa, Muslims might comfortably use false arguments to turn Mexicans against their northern neighbors. They might, for instance, argue that Islam is a religion of "racial equality," whereas Christianity is the "white man's" religion, imposed on their ancestors by racist whites who sought to keep them "impoverished" beyond the border. Islamist strategies in Mexico amount to trying to win the unbelievers over to their side, whether through conversion or just cooperation. For those who refuse to cooperate, they are infidels to be used in any way that seems fit.
Some of the lyrics go like this:
join us this month - the theme is metal. for details, click on the atc swap link at the top of the blog here.
In the Freemans space, Sherry mutes the eye-popping color by applying a layer of fine sand to the surface of the photographs, making the lumpy rock formations more delicate and tactile. His tints move closer to pastels, and in some cases, the sand obscures the detail in the photographs to the point where the works become extremely subtle, striated gradients. This abstraction is taken one step further in a series of colored photograms, where the angles and shapes of the rock walls are used as inspiration for simple layered patterns, once again executed in a spectrum of undiluted radiance.
What you did not do before.
There are four main characters: an environmental lawyer/activist, a stay-at-home mother, a musician and a college student. Each of them has to deal with the question what kind of person am I going to be? over and over again. (That old expression “in between a rock and a hard place” comes to mind.) Two of the characters are primarily concerned with being “good,” and two of them are primarily concerned with being autonomous, but in the in-between there is a world of emotional and moral possibility. Surely there is no freer person than a white, well-educated, wealthy, Western man, but in the person of Walter Berglund (arguably the heart of the novel) there could be no one more weighed down by expectations, obligations and compromises.
Well, it did make me feel a bit better to think of her with that sexy long dress tucked into her knickers, peddling furiously home along the main road…cos that’s exactly the sort of thing that I would do….
But as life goes things happen and you have to take care of them first. I have been at Hospitals and Doctor offices with my parents, and it will be a little while before I can make a video.
Tobacco policy is essentially a closed shop in this country. The Department of Health pays ASH to come up with policy documents (such as Beyond Smoking Kills) and then pays them to campaign for the policies it has recommended. The DoH then uses taxpayers' money to pay its other front groups (such as Smokefree Northwest) to lobby at the grass-roots level. The All Party Parliamentary Group on Smoking is run by ASH (Deborah Arnott is its secretariat) and they work to brief MPs and lobby for the same policies. ASH and the DoH work closely together behind the scenes to mislead both the House of Commons and the House of Lords (as the Dark Market e-mails reveal).
This was written by Sandra Horn, of Tattybogle fame, who once had the dubious pleasure of teaching me psychology. She had a great sense of humour, and needed it.
What doesn’t kill you makes you stronger, stronger
Maybe some of those posts will be meaningful. Maybe some of them will feature kittens (because everybody loves kittens, right?). There’s even a chance that they could feature me ranting about how I almost killed myself at work the other day. I dunno, but the real point is, expect some more activity on my side of the screen very shortly.
Dave Kenny
Just for the record I do think families and communites have been destroyed in this country - and I do think immigration and multicult have had a massive part in this destruction, But not the only part.
The joint efforts of the Animas Watershed Partnership and San Juan Watershed Group will hopefully serve to bring together residents of the Animas watershed, and link Colorado residents to their downstream neighbors through preservation of their shared natural resource.
Resurrection- the bodily raising of Jesus Christ from the dead on the third day after he died on the cross
Oh rulers, this is a disgrace on your part. I do not want to say that this is prohibited, because many of you do not care about what is permitted or prohibited. But I say that it is a disgrace on your part to do nothing but watch while your brothers are being destroyed, slaughtered and tormented. This is extremely strange.
The injury that led to Synchronised being put down occurred at Fence 11. He appears to decelerate into the fence and does not jump it cleanly, dragging his hindlegs and hindquarters through the fence. It would appear he fractured his right hind tibia and fibula in the process.
Chandler dies & Jonah notes that at least he had a sense of humor.
*Dr. Seuss
1) We have decided to move Her Majesty from a daycare we love to another one closer to our home and to my office. I gave 30 days notice yesterday. It breaks my heart because Wonder Boy and Her Majesty started there in the infant room, in 1998 and 2004, respectively, and Wonder Boy went all the way through until he started kindergarten. However, I am hoping that cutting down on my daily commute from South Austin to Hyde Park to downtown -- an hour each way -- will allow for more quality time at home, especially in the evenings. We have a daycare lined up that comes with high recommendations, but it doesn't have the funky central Austin crunchy-granola feel of our current place.
And whether they agree or disagree, it’s a thrill when a reader comments and gives feedback to the words you typed earlier in the morning.
Listen to the breeze
Neat!)
In that house I talked with
DOCUMENTARIES & SHORTS
Slowly add flour mixture, mixing until combined. Drop rounded teaspoons of dough on cookie sheets and bake at 350 degrees for 10 minutes. Cool completely.
The next day, I found my fucking wallet on the floor of my closet, right near where I'd hidden the stocking stuffers.
If you have a favorite Wisconsin brewery or Wisconsin brew, please share that with us in the comment box. And if there is one you're curious about, ask. I will do my best, as daunting as it may be, to secure a representative sampling of their products and report back here. ("What do I need with another six pack of beer? It's research, Honey, research! My readers are counting on me.......")
If. That was a dangerous word. Tori stopped herself. She could not afford to let herself indulge in alternate scenarios, however innocent they might be. There was to be no confusion about her next move.
Joseph- He is thoughtful
my heart is bubbling. yes. bubbling.
Putin is so busy that he can't even be bothered to learn from Gorbachev's mistakes, which is why his new big idea is to shut down the drunk tanks and shunt their clients off to the Accident & Emergency ward of the nearest hospital.
There are concerns about “a concrete canyon forming along the Speed River,” said Stan Kozak, representing a group of downtown riverside property owners known as the Allan’s Mill Pond Neighbourhood Group.
Now depending on your answers you are going to categorize each person into one of three categories.
100g x Sultanas
if this doesn’t get fixed in 72 hours i swear i’m switching to a Maxis line.
But the digital revolution, the invention of the ebook and the boom in self publishing means that just about anyone can claim to offer a revolutionary new paradigm that will promote new writers against the evil corporate publishing world.
Consider this…5 years ago, Qualcomm was focused on selling the value of their chipset to mobile operators and using them to drive adoption to a long list of OEMs. When I was managing the browser at Openwave, we had a similar strategy in place. It was effective because decisions were made in a decentralized fashion and having a lot of resources from a sales perspective meant that you could drive adoption. Think of this visually as a wagon wheel with Qualcomm being the hub and the carriers and the OEMs as the spokes.
It sat through some of the 20th century as the Polish National Home (Polski Dom Narodowy), a community hall and restaurant for Polish New Yorkers (whose influences can still be seen all around this area of the East Village). At a certain point in the 1960s, part of the space was opened as a small bar by Stanley Tolkin, whose watering hole Stanley's Bar at 13th and Ave B was already a huge magnet for the bohemian set.
Stir the ice crystals into the center of the pan and return to the freezer.
Throughout the past week the bike has provided a unique perspective to appreciate the tragedy of the First World War. This is especially the case for the subtle changes in the elevation of the landscape, through which I now appreciate the importance of strategic positions such as Vimy Ridge, Bullecourt, Pozieres and Le Hammel. On Vimy Ridge the landscape was still churned up from all of the destruction of the conflict. I usually grunt and grumble to myself during such steep ascents, but as I struggled up to the spectacular Canadian War Memorial the pain of the cycling gave way to a deeper understanding and affiliation with the thousands who charged these very slopes all those years ago. It was an eerie experience camping in places where thousands of soldiers died during the war. In Pozieres I slept in a gentleman’s garden where the entire town was destroyed in the war. It proved to be a restless sleep thinking about the senseless death of so many young lives.
Last Chance Harvey
1. Personal, persistent, diligent, constant, systematized Bible study is one means (2 Tim. 2:15).
Can you believe that it is school holiday time again? But this time it is a whole 6 weeks long. As much as I love the break fromn the routine of school drop offs and pick ups it can be hard to keep away boredom these school holidays. So we have put together a list of heaps of cool stuff to do this Christmas break with the kids!
The daughter then asked. "What does it mean, mother?"
David stayed behind and lost a different battle.
E. Fullmer
Posted by Patrick & Amanda at 3:05 PM 2 comments
I was only able to cover a few choice examples in the pages of my book Change Comes to Dinner, but there are thousands of other innovative efforts where those came from. One example I found particularly inspiring was the Farmers Fresh Market program run by the Foothills Connect Business and Technology Center in Rutherfordton, North Carolina.
Asparagus
It’s time to try and “reconnect” — with nature, and all that it means.
I had never tried Coconut Rice until a few days ago. And don't even get me started on how much I liked it. I must have said it 1,000 times with every delicious bite.
Nate: Hmm. I think he's watching my new train video.
BRACELETS: MANDALA ~ REIKI Bracelet ~ Black Stone
It’s amazing how much havoc the holidays can wreak on your everyday routines. ‘Tis way past time to get back to my regular postings.
I've decided to build my house out of earthbags, for a variety of reasons which I will post about in-depth soon, but the reason I want to mention today is that there is a wealth of information and support on the Internet for this method. Here's just one example:
She was actively involved in her husband’s political career (he was elected as a member of Parliament a few months before they were married), which meant delving into the slings and arrows of battle between the alternating prime ministers Benjamin Disraeli and William Gladstone. She proved an effective fund-raiser and organizer for her husband’s campaigns and edited many of his speeches. She was a “new woman” before it was fashionable to be one, her biographer Ralph Martin wrote.
“I’m sure I cheated in board games,” the Georgia Tech coach said. “And when I played, yeah, you’d do stuff. Move the ball forward. Move it back. Kick it. Maybe grab a guy where you’re not supposed to. But heck, everybody does that.”
Onto alliteration. According to Webster’s Dictionary, alliteration is “the commencement of two or more words of a word group with the same letter.”
He was rich, full-bodied, red-blooded, and I couldn't wait to ravish him. I raised my glass and gave a slow wink and an even slower smile to show my interest. A flirt by nature, I had forgotten how fun it was to flutter my eyelashes and use my feminine wiles.
Today I rocked the ultra-stylish "white sneakers while commuting" look into the office. But more on that in a moment.
I was rather nervous, especially playing in Nashville, TN, but when the time came I just put fingers to keys and played. Oblivious to all that was outside of me, in that place I could feel Granny’s presence and see her sweetly smiling as she would, and gently clapping along.
Kathleen Edwards
Stalker presses for a closer relationship, but Deuce sees him as a training partner, and she’s busy trying to find her place in Salvation. She refuses to accept that she’s wrong for being who she is, but tensions rise as she struggles against the status quo. Her feelings for Fade haven’t changed, but he seems not to want her around anymore. Confused and lonely, she starts looking for a way out.
Or not, the link appears to be broken, WTF?
You absolutely adore your engagement ring, and can’t wait for the day you’ll be able to wear your wedding band. So why should his wedding ring be any different? Give him a wedding band that suits his style and he’ll be proud to wear it forever.
You had your new car with its moonroof and bright paint and the sun danced between the kudzu vines and dappled the road in shadows. We stopped at a country store at Sexton Bend for ice and laughed uneasily at the Rebel flags and fishing worms in the cooler, the Styrofoam cups of nightcrawlers stored right beside foil-wrapped sandwiches and microwave burritos.
When I was a kid, I always knew how hard my parents worked to make ends meet each month. We had budgets for everything that we had to stick to. Budgets for school clothes, food, entertainment, etc. I remember before we had our own VCR, we used to rent this huge hideous blue betamax machine and rent a video now and again as a treat. We had a chore chart at home where we divided up all the household chores between my brother, sister and I. On top of their jobs, my parents were always active in our church and also with a service club they belonged too.
Not a Bollywood romantic, “Rab Rakha” made me melt! The song is from the movie Love, Breakups and Zindagi and I LOVE IT! The four voices, one sentiment, many different parts…the song is amazing, nothing else to say here.
CONQUER AND DESTROY!
Recently, I went on yet another business trip. Fortunately, this was the first business trip I've made in some time, almost a year if memory serves correctly. I have traveled several times a year over the past ten years or so, sometimes more, sometimes less. On this latest trip I actually tried to write down a list of all of the business trips I have taken as a way to pass the time during a long layover. I stopped at 25, unable and unwilling to think about it anymore.
shopping, but I went over on my cell minutes, just don't
It’s silly to think the law means that nothing can ever become more complicated. You can see examples everywhere of complicated and intricate systems arising out of simpler ones. You can take a pile of CDs strewn haphazardly across the floor and alphabetise them; you can plant an acorn, and watch a complete oak tree grow (though only if you have a hell of a lot of spare time).
Let me wrap my arms around you
If the Iranians are good at anything, it's their methods of exporting and spreading terrorism. We certainly have seen this via Hamas and Hezbollah but what is now coming to light is a network of mosques around the world that literally are run by the Iranian Revolutionary Guards and their intelligence services. These mosques in countries like Saudi Arabia and Bahrain are tasked with the eventual overthrow of those governments but many don't know that the Iranians also control mosques in Europe and yes, right here in America.
Combine flour(s), cocoa, baking soda, and salt in small bowl. Beat butter, white sugar and corn syrup until creamy. Beat in egg.
So I loooooved getting on Skype with a Malaysian in London this morning (her evening) just to gab and know that I’m maybe not crazy. That moving from a first-world country back to the third world is something other people dream of too.
Well, here we are, Christmas eve and I have already received a wonderful present. The day started taking another in the series of seascapes from the normally, but currently stormy Gold Coast, during which I found myself knee-deep in swirling, surging storm generated white water, Nikon D5000 on tripod in front of me.
I figured I could assemble a mix of oats, fruit, nuts, and spices that my friend could easily pour into a cup and nuke at the office while checking emails. However, I wanted to make this look pretty. There’s a big difference between wrapping a box of instant Quaker and packing wholesome ingredients in a pretty container. Thanks to Google, I found this recipe as a base: http://blogs.familyeducation.com/parenting/moms/sweet-pea-chef/gifts-from-kitchen-20. I changed up some of the ingredients, subbing dried blueberries for cranberries, and dried dates for brown sugar. Anyone can use cranberries, but blueberries are so much more special! They are also full of fiber. Same for dates. I also made 1.5 times the quantity, because bigger is better. Except for your tush.
The bible warned us that we would know not the hour of our lord’s arrival; but the bible didn’t say anything about the ships armed with plasma cannons that could decimate entire cities in a single blow, or anything about the soldiers with the armor capable of withstanding a tactical missile strike. 2013 was off to a great start.
Charles stared round the sitting room of the lodgings he had occupied since he’d come to Lisbon four years ago. Papers overflowing the writing desk. Books crowded on the bookshelves that lined three walls (two of which he’d purchased after he moved in) and stacked on the floor and nearly every available surface. One comfortable frayed tapestry wing-back chair by the fireplace. A door leading to the adjoining bedchamber, also crowded with books but with little else to give it a personal stamp.
1 pound de-veined shrimp in shell, heads removed
Yet as I fired up the laptop, I kept my fingers crossed that I might be able to get an internet connection. Apparently there is a wi-fi connection available, I’m either out of range or the huge trucks parked on either side of me are blocking the signal. I feel disconnected. I should be lapping up this new experience but I feel completely disconnected from my life. It has only been one day since we entered the US and I shut my phone off, thereby terminating my connection with friends and family back home. I long to get on face book to see what everyone is doing, I long to text my girlfriends with updates.
However, the key word for those who construct speed figures, is the word “bounce”. In short, it means that most horses which run a career-best performance in their last race will invariably regress in their next effort. I’ve found this to be true over the years, with the exception of young horses such as Bodemeister, which can continue to improve until they reach a plateau of sorts.
MRC 604, PO Box 37012
Hello! Happy Monday to you all! Well we have made it through two days since the end of Spring break. Now that we are back at it we are starting to prepare our students for the End of Grade tests that we have in May. In North Carolina fourth grade students are tested on reading and math. We spend some time trying to get our students to remember everything that we crammed in through out the year! I thought I would tell you about some of the things that we do to review because I know many of you are also starting to prepare for your state tests. One of the things that I really enjoy doing with my students is Laura Candler's "Buddy Test Prep". She has created a really neat activity that helps students to figure out problems by themselves, and with a partner. You are also able to see how your students do on test practices. You can download the packet here for free.
"Great idea! I just learned a new way to weather wood... soak steel wool in vinegar over night and paint it onto the wood. It turns the wood a beautiful weathered color instantly! One of the best things I've learned in the blog world!"
